 
 
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
FORM 10-K/A
(Amendment No. 1)
 
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year  ended December  31, 2019 
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period fr om                      to                      
Commission File Number: 001-34756
 
Tesla, Inc.
(Exact name of r egistrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
Delawar e  91-2197729
(State or  other  jurisdiction of
incorporation or  organization)  (I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
   
3500 Deer  Creek Road
Palo Alto, California  94304
(Addr ess of principal executive offices)  (Zip Code)
(650) 681-5000
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including ar ea code)
Securities r egister ed pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
 
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Common stock TSLA The Nasdaq Global Select Market
 
Securities r egister ed pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
None
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.    Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act.    Yes  ☐    No  ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (“Exchange Act”)
during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past
90 days.    Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T  (§
232.405 of this chapter)  during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files).    Yes  ☒    No  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a lar ge accelerated filer , an accelerated filer , a non-accelerated filer , a smaller reporting company or an emer ging growth
company . See the definitions of “lar ge accelerated filer ,” “accelerated filer ,” “smaller reporting company” and “emer ging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act:
 
Large accelerated filer  ☒   Accelerated filer  ☐
    
Non-accelerated filer  ☐    Smaller reporting company  ☐
       
Emer ging growth company  ☐     
If an emer ging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised
financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.    ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).    Yes  ☐    No  ☒
The aggregate market value of voting stock held by non-af filiates of the registrant, as of June 30, 2019, the last day of the registrant’ s most recently completed second
fiscal quarter , was $ 31.54  billion (based on the closing price for shares of the registrant’ s Common Stock as reported by the NASDAQ Global Select Market on June 30, 2019).
Shares of Common Stock held by each executive of ficer, director , and holder of 5% or more of the outstanding Common Stock have been excluded in that such persons may be
deemed to be af filiates. This determination of af filiate status is not necessarily a conclusive determination for other purposes.
As of February 7, 2020, there were 181,341,586  shares of the registrant’ s Common Stock outstanding.
 
 
 
 
 
EXPLANATORY NOTE
On February 13, 2020, Tesla, Inc. (“Tesla,” the “Company,” “we,” “us,” or “our”) filed our Annual Report on Form 10-K for
the fiscal year ended December 31, 2019 (the “Original Form 10-K”). The Original Form 10-K omitted Part III, Items 10
(Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance), 11 (Executive Compensation), 12 (Security Ownership of Certain
Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters), 13 (Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and
Director Independence) and 14 (Principal Accountant Fees and Services) in reliance on General Instruction G(3) to Form 10-K,
which provides that such information may be either incorporated by reference from the registrant’s definitive proxy statement or
included in an amendment to Form 10-K, in either case filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”) not later
than 120 days after the end of the fiscal year.
We currently expect that our definitive proxy statement for the 2020 annual meeting of stockholders will be filed in May
2020, which is later than the 120th day after the end of the last fiscal year. Accordingly, this Amendment No. 1 to Form 10-K (this
“Amendment”) is being filed solely to:
 • amend Part III, Items 10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 of the Original Form 10-K to include the information required by such
Items;
 • delete the reference on the cover of the Original Form 10-K to the incorporation by reference of portions of our proxy
statement into Part III of the Original Form 10-K; and
 • file new certifications of our principal executive officers and principal financial officer as exhibits to this Amendment
under Item 15 of Part IV hereof, pursuant to Rule 12b-15 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the
“Exchange Act”).
This Amendment does not otherwise change or update any of the disclosures set forth in the Original Form 10-K and does not
otherwise reflect any events occurring after the filing of the Original Form 10-K.
 
 
 
 
TESLA, INC.
AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO ANNUAL REPORT ON FORM 10-K/A
FOR THE YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019
INDEX
 
    Page
EXPLANATORY NOTE.   
     
PART III.   
    
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance  1
Item 11. Executive Compensation  5
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters  25
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence  28
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services  30
    
PART IV.   
    
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules  31
     
   
Signatures  65
 
 
 
i
 
PART III
ITEM 10.DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Board of Directors
Background and Qualifications
The names of the members of Tesla’s Board of Directors (the “Board”), their respective ages, their positions with Tesla and
other biographical information as of April 23, 2020 are set forth below. Except for Messrs. Elon Musk, our Chief Executive Officer
and a director, and Kimbal Musk, a director, who are brothers, there are no other family relationships among any of our directors or
executive officers.
 
Name  Age  Chair of the
Board  Audit
Committee Compensation
Committee  Nominating
and
Corporate
Governance
Committee  Disclosure
Controls
Committee
Elon Musk  48          
Robyn Denholm  56 X  X  X  X  X
Ira Ehrenpreis  51     X  X   
Lawrence J. Ellison  75          
Antonio Gracias(1)  49   X       
Stephen Jurvetson(2)  53   X      X
Hiromichi Mizuno  54   X       
James Murdoch  47   X    X  X
Kimbal Musk  47          
Kathleen Wilson-
Thompson 
52     X  X  X
 
(1) Mr. Gracias will not stand for re-election when his current term expires at the 2021 annual meeting of stockholders.
(2) Mr. Jurvetson will not stand for re-election when his current term expires at the 2020 annual meeting of stockholders.
Elon Musk has served as our Chief Executive Officer since October 2008 and as a member of the Board since April 2004.
Mr. Musk has also served as Chief Executive Officer, Chief Technology Officer and Chairman of Space Exploration Technologies
Corporation, an advanced rocket and spacecraft manufacturing and services company (“SpaceX”), since May 2002, and served as
Chairman of the Board of SolarCity Corporation, a solar installation company (“SolarCity”), from July 2006 until its acquisition by
us in November 2016. Mr. Musk is also a founder of The Boring Company, an infrastructure company, and of Neuralink Corp., a
company focused on developing brain-machine interfaces. Prior to SpaceX, Mr. Musk co-founded PayPal, an electronic payment
system, which was acquired by eBay in October 2002, and Zip2 Corporation, a provider of Internet enterprise software and
services, which was acquired by Compaq in March 1999. Mr. Musk holds a B.A. in physics from the University of Pennsylvania
and a B.S. in business from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania.
We believe that Mr. Musk possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including the
perspective and experience he brings as our Chief Executive Officer, one of our founders and our largest stockholder, which brings
historic knowledge, operational expertise and continuity to the Board.
Robyn Denholm has been a member of the Board since August 2014 and its Chair since November 2018. From October
2018 to June 2019, Ms. Denholm was Chief Financial Officer and Head of Strategy of Telstra Corporation Limited, a
telecommunications company, where she also served as its Chief Operations Officer from January 2017 to October 2018. Prior to
Telstra, from August 2007 to July 2016, Ms. Denholm was with Juniper Networks, Inc., a manufacturer of networking equipment,
serving in executive roles including Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Chief Operations Officer. Prior to
joining Juniper Networks, Ms. Denholm served in various executive roles at Sun Microsystems, Inc. from January 1996 to August
2007. Ms. Denholm also
1
 
served at Toyota Motor Corporation Australia for seven years and at Arthur Andersen & Company for five years in various finance
assignments. Ms. Denholm previously served as a director of ABB Ltd. from 2016 to 2017 and of Echelon Corporation Inc. from
2008 to 2013. Ms. Denholm is a member of the Australian Institute of Company Directors and a Fellow of the Institute of
Chartered Accountants of Australia, and holds a Bachelor’s degree in Economics from the University of Sydney and a Master’s
degree in Commerce from the University of New South Wales.
We believe that Ms. Denholm possesses specific attributes that qualify her to serve as a member of the Board and as its
Chair as well as the chair of each of our Audit Committee and Disclosure Controls Committee, such as her executive leadership
experience and her financial and accounting expertise with international companies, including in the technology and automotive
industries.
Ira Ehrenpreis has been a member of the Board since May 2007. Mr. Ehrenpreis has been a venture capitalist since 1996.
He is founder and managing member of DBL Partners, a leading impact investing venture capital firm formed in 2015, and
previously led the Energy Innovation practice at Technology Partners. In the venture capital industry, Mr. Ehrenpreis has served on
the Board, Executive Committee, and as Annual Meeting Chairman of the National Venture Capital Association (NVCA). Mr.
Ehrenpreis currently serves as the President of the Western Association of Venture Capitalists (WAVC) and as the Chairman of the
VCNetwork, the largest and most active California venture capital organization. In the Cleantech sector, he has served on several
industry boards, including the American Council on Renewable Energy and the Cleantech Venture Network (Past Chairman of
Advisory Board), as the Chairman of the Clean-Tech Investor Summit for nine years, and on the Stanford Precourt Institute for
Energy (PIE) Advisory Council. Mr. Ehrenpreis also serves as Chairman of the World Energy Innovation Forum. Mr. Ehrenpreis
was recently awarded the 2018 NACD Directorship 100 for his influential leadership in the boardroom and corporate governance
community. Mr. Ehrenpreis holds a B.A. from the University of California, Los Angeles and a J.D. and M.B.A. from Stanford
University.
We believe that Mr. Ehrenpreis possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board and to serve
as chair of each of our Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee and our Compensation Committee, including his
experience in the Cleantech and venture capital industries.
Lawrence J. Ellison has been a member of the Board since December 2018. Mr. Ellison is the founder of Oracle
Corporation, a software and technology company, has served as its Chief Technical Officer since September 2014 and previously
served as its Chief Executive Officer from June 1977 to September 2014. Mr. Ellison has also served on Oracle’s board of directors
since June 1977, including as its Chairman since September 2014 and previously from May 1995 to January 2004.
We believe that Mr. Ellison possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
long-term leadership of one of the most successful technology companies in the world and experience with technology product
development and strategy.
Antonio Gracias has been a member of the Board since May 2007 and served as our Lead Independent Director from
September 2010 to April 2019. Since 2003, Mr. Gracias has been Chief Executive Officer of Valor Management LLC, a private
equity firm. Mr. Gracias is a director of SpaceX, and was a director of SolarCity until its acquisition by us in November 2016.
Mr. Gracias holds a joint B.S. and M.S. degree in international finance and economics from the Georgetown University School of
Foreign Service and a J.D. from the University of Chicago Law School.
We believe that Mr. Gracias possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
management experience with a nationally recognized private equity firm and his operations management and supply chain
optimization expertise.
Mr. Gracias will not stand for re-election when his current term expires at Tesla’s 2021 annual meeting of stockholders.
2
 
Stephen Jurvetson has been a member of the Board since June 2009, and was on a leave of absence from the Board from
November 2017 to April 2019. Mr. Jurvetson is a co-founder of Future Ventures, a venture capital firm, and previously was a
Managing Director of Draper Fisher Jurvetson, a venture capital firm, from 1995 to 2017. Mr. Jurvetson is a director of SpaceX.
Mr. Jurvetson holds B.S. and M.S. degrees in electrical engineering from Stanford University and an M.B.A. from the Stanford
Business School.
We believe that Mr. Jurvetson possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
experience in the venture capital industry and his years of business and leadership experience.
Mr. Jurvetson will not stand for re-election when his current term expires at Tesla’s 2020 annual meeting of stockholders.
Hiromichi Mizuno has been a member of the Board since April 2020. From January 2015 to March 2020, Mr. Mizuno was
Executive Managing Director and Chief Investment Officer of Japan’s Government Pension Investment Fund, the largest pension
fund in the world. Previously, Mr. Mizuno was a partner at Coller Capital, a private equity firm, from 2003. In addition to being a
career-long finance and investment professional, Mr. Mizuno is a member of numerous business and government advisory boards,
including the board of the PRI, an investor initiative to promote responsible investment in partnership with the United Nations, the
World Economic Forum’s Global Future Council, and the Japanese government’s strategic fund integrated advisory board.
Mr. Mizuno holds a B.A. in Law from Osaka City University and an M.B.A. from the Kellogg Graduate School of Management at
Northwestern University.
We believe that Mr. Mizuno possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
deep understanding of international economics, financial markets, and government policies.
James Murdoch has been a member of the Board since July 2017. Mr. Murdoch has been the Chief Executive Officer of
Lupa Systems, a private investment company that he founded, since March 2019. Previously, Mr. Murdoch held a number of
leadership roles at Twenty-First Century Fox, Inc., a media company (“21CF”), over two decades, including its Chief Executive
Officer from 2015 to March 2019, its Co-Chief Operating Officer from 2014 to 2015, its Deputy Chief Operating Officer and
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, International from 2011 to 2014 and its Chairman and Chief Executive, Europe and Asia
from 2007 to 2011. Previously, he served as the Chief Executive Officer of Sky plc from 2003 to 2007, and as the Chairman and
Chief Executive Officer of STAR Group Limited, a subsidiary of 21CF, from 2000 to 2003. Mr. Murdoch also serves on the board
of News Corporation, and formerly served on the boards of 21CF from 2017 to March 2019, of Sky plc from 2016 to 2018, of
GlaxoSmithKline plc from 2009 to 2012 and of Sotheby’s from 2010 to 2012.  
We believe that Mr. Murdoch possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
lengthy executive and board experience across numerous companies, extensive knowledge of international markets and strategies,
and experience with the adoption of new technologies.
Kimbal Musk has been a member of the Board since April 2004. Mr. Musk is a co-founder of The Kitchen, a growing family
of businesses with the goal of providing all Americans with access to real food, and has also served as its Chief Executive Officer
since its founding in 2004. In 2010, Mr. Musk became the Executive Director of Big Green (formerly The Kitchen Community), a
non-profit organization that creates learning gardens in schools across the United States. Mr. Musk also co-founded Square Roots,
an urban farming incubator program, in 2016. Previously, Mr. Musk was a co-founder of Zip2 Corporation, a provider of enterprise
software and services, which was acquired by Compaq in March 1999. From 2012 to 2015, Mr. Musk was a director of the
Anschutz Health and Wellness Center, a facility at the University of Colorado School of Medicine providing research, education
and wellness services with the goal of achieving healthier lifestyles. Mr. Musk is a director of SpaceX, and was a director of
Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. from 2013 to 2019. Mr. Musk holds a B. Comm. in business from Queen’s University and is a
graduate of The French Culinary Institute in New York City.
3
 
We believe that Mr. Musk possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of the Board, including his
business experience in retail and consumer markets, his experience on the Board, and his experience with technology companies.
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson has been a member of the Board since December 2018. Ms. Wilson-Thompson has served as
Executive Vice President and Global Chief Human Resources Officer of Walgreens Boots Alliance, Inc., a global pharmacy and
wellbeing company, since December 2014, and previously served as Senior Vice President and Chief Human Resources Officer
from January 2010 to December 2014. Prior to Walgreens, Ms. Wilson-Thompson held various legal and operational roles at The
Kellogg Company, a food manufacturing company, from July 2005 to December 2009, including most recently as its Senior Vice
President, Global Human Resources. Ms. Wilson-Thompson also serves on the board of directors of Ashland Global Holdings Inc.
and served on the board of directors of Vulcan Materials Company from 2009 to 2018. Ms. Wilson-Thompson holds an A.B. in
English Literature from the University of Michigan and a J.D. and L.L.M. (Corporate and Finance Law) from Wayne State
University.
We believe that Ms. Wilson-Thompson possesses specific attributes that qualify her to serve as a member of the Board,
including her executive and board experience with both consumer-focused and industrial companies, as well as her expertise in
managing human resources and other operations at mature companies with large workforces.
Additional Board Information
On October 16, 2018, the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York entered a final judgment approving the
terms of a settlement filed with the court on September 29, 2018, in connection with the actions taken by the SEC relating to Elon
Musk’s August 7, 2018 Twitter post that he was considering taking Tesla private. On April 26, 2019, this settlement was amended
to clarify certain of its terms, which was subsequently approved by the Court. Mr. Musk did not admit or deny any of the SEC’s
allegations, and there is no restriction on Mr. Musk’s ability to serve as an officer or director on the Board (other than as its Chair
for a specified time).
Audit Committee
The Board has four standing committees comprised solely of independent directors—the Audit Committee, the
Compensation Committee, the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, and the Disclosure Controls Committee. The
Audit Committee, which has been established in accordance with Section 3(a)(58) of the Exchange Act, currently consists of
Robyn Denholm, Antonio Gracias, Stephen Jurvetson, Hiromichi Mizuno, and James Murdoch, each of whom is “independent” as
such term is defined for audit committee members by the listing standards of The NASDAQ Stock Market LLC (“NASDAQ”).
Ms. Denholm is the chair of the Audit Committee. The Board has determined that Ms. Denholm is an “audit committee financial
expert” as defined in the rules of the SEC.
Executive Officers
The names of Tesla’s executive officers, their ages, their positions with Tesla and other biographical information as of
April 23, 2020, are set forth below. Except for Messrs. Elon Musk and Kimbal Musk who are brothers, there are no other family
relationships among any of our directors or executive officers.
 
Name  Age Position
Elon Musk  48 Chief Executive Officer
Zachary Kirkhorn  35 Chief Financial Officer
Jerome Guillen  47 President, Automotive
Andrew Baglino  39 Senior Vice President, Powertrain and
Energy Engineering
 
Elon Musk. For a brief biography of Mr. Musk, see “Board of Directors—Background and Qualifications” under this Item
10 above.
Zachary Kirkhorn has served as our Chief Financial Officer since March 2019. Previously, Mr. Kirkhorn served in various
finance positions continuously since joining Tesla in March 2010, other than between August 2011
4
 
and June 2013 during which he attended business school, including most recently as Vice President, Finance, Financial Planning
and Business Operations from December 2018 to March 2019. Mr. Kirkhorn holds dual B.S.E. degrees in economics and
mechanical engineering and applied mechanics from the University of Pennsylvania and an M.B.A. from Harvard University.
Jerome Guillen has served as our President of Automotive since September 2018 and previously served as our Vice
President, Trucks and Other Programs from January 2016 to September 2018, our Vice President, Worldwide Sales & Service from
April 2013 to August 2015 and our Model S Program Director from November 2010 to April 2013. Prior to joining us, Mr. Guillen
served as Director, Business Innovation at Daimler AG, an automobile manufacturer, from September 2007 to November 2010. Mr.
Guillen also served as Director, New Product Development at Freightliner LLC, a manufacturer of trucks and heavy duty vehicles,
from September 2002 to September 2007. Mr. Guillen holds a PhD in mechanical engineering from the University of Michigan, in
addition to a dual degree in energy technologies from Escuela Tecnica Superior de Ingenieros Industriales in Madrid and in
mechanical engineering from Ecole Nationale Superieure de Techniques Avancees in Paris.
Andrew Baglino has served as our Senior Vice President, Powertrain and Energy Engineering since October 2019.
Previously, Mr. Baglino served in various engineering positions continuously since joining Tesla in March 2006. Mr. Baglino holds
a B.S. in electrical engineering from Stanford University.
Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports
Under Section 16 of the Exchange Act, Tesla’s directors, executive officers and any persons holding more than 10% of the
Tesla’s common stock are required to report initial ownership of the Tesla common stock and any subsequent changes in ownership
to the SEC. Specific due dates have been established by the SEC, and Tesla is required to disclose in this Amendment any failure to
file required ownership reports by these dates. Based solely upon a review of forms filed with the SEC and the written
representations of such persons, Tesla is aware of no late Section 16(a) filings other than a late Form 4 filed by each of Lawrence J.
Ellison and Kathleen Wilson-Thompson reporting an automatic stock option grant in June 2019 for their Board service, due to an
administrative delay by Tesla.
Code of Business Conduct and Ethics and Corporate Governance Guidelines
The Board sets high standards for Tesla’s workforce, officers and directors. Tesla is committed to establishing an operating
framework that exercises appropriate oversight of responsibilities at all levels throughout the Company and managing its affairs in
a manner consistent with rigorous principles of business ethics. Accordingly, Tesla has adopted a Code of Business Conduct and
Ethics, which is applicable to Tesla and its subsidiaries’ directors, officers and personnel. Tesla has also adopted Corporate
Governance Guidelines, which, in conjunction with our certificate of incorporation, bylaws, and charters of the standing
committees of the Board, form the framework for Tesla’s corporate governance. The Code of Business Conduct and Ethics and the
Corporate Governance Guidelines are each available on Tesla’s website at: http://ir.tesla.com/corporate-governance/highlights.
Tesla will disclose on its website any amendment to the Code of Business Conduct and Ethics, as well as any waivers of the Code
of Business Conduct and Ethics, that are required to be disclosed by the rules of the SEC or NASDAQ.
ITEM 11.EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Compensation Discussion and Analysis
The following discussion and analysis of compensation arrangements of our named executive officers for 2019 should be read
together with the compensation tables and related disclosures set forth below. This discussion contains forward-looking statements
that are based on our current considerations, expectations, and determinations regarding future compensation programs. The
actual amount and form of compensation and the compensation programs that we adopt may differ materially from current or
planned programs as summarized in this discussion.
The following discussion and analysis relates to the compensation arrangements for 2019 of (i) our principal executive
officer, (ii) our principal financial officer, (iii) our former principal financial officer who served in such
5
 
capacity until March 2019, and (iv) the two most highly compensated persons, other than our principal executive officer and
principal financial officer, who were serving as executive officers at the end of our fiscal year ended December 31, 2019 (our
“named executive officers”). We had no other executive officers serving at the end of our fiscal year ended December 31, 2019.
Our named executive officers for fiscal year 2019 were:
    Name  Position
Elon Musk  Chief Executive Officer
Zachary Kirkhorn  Chief Financial Officer
Jerome Guillen  President, Automotive
Andrew Baglino  Senior Vice President, Powertrain and
Energy Engineering
Deepak Ahuja  Former Chief Financial Officer
Mr. Ahuja transitioned from his previous role as Chief Financial Officer effective March 2019.
Compensation Philosophy
As the world’s first vertically integrated sustainable energy company, our mission is to accelerate the world’s transition to
sustainable energy. We design, develop, manufacture and sell high-performance, fully electric vehicles and energy generation and
storage systems, and also install and maintain such energy systems and sell solar electricity. To achieve our goals, we have
designed, and intend to modify as necessary, our compensation and benefits program and philosophy, to attract, retain and
incentivize talented, deeply qualified and committed executive officers who share our philosophy and desire to work toward these
goals. We believe compensation incentives for executive officers should promote the success of our company and motivate them to
pursue corporate objectives. We have put an emphasis on structuring compensation incentives so as to reward clear, easily
measured performance goals that closely align their incentives with the long-term interests of our stockholders. Further, we have
sought to harmonize the compensation structures of our other employees to conform to our overall compensation philosophy.
Our current compensation programs reflect our startup origins in that they consist primarily of salary and equity awards.
Consistent with our historical compensation philosophy, we do not currently provide an annual cash bonus program or any
severance provisions for continued cash payments or other benefits upon termination of employment with us.
As our needs evolve, we intend to continue to evaluate our philosophy and compensation programs as circumstances require,
and, at a minimum, the Compensation Committee will review executive compensation annually. We may from time to time make
new equity awards and adjustments to the components of our executive compensation program in connection with our periodic
compensation review.
Key Factors in Determining Executive Compensation
Role of Compensation Committee in Executive Compensation
The Compensation Committee has overall responsibility for recommending to the Board the compensation of our Chief
Executive Officer and determining the compensation of our other executive officers. Members of the Compensation Committee are
appointed by the Board. Currently, the Compensation Committee consists of three members of the Board: Ira Ehrenpreis (Chair),
Robyn Denholm, and Kathleen Wilson-Thompson, none of whom is an executive officer of Tesla, and each of whom qualifies as
(i) an “independent director” under the NASDAQ Stock Market Rules and (ii) an “outside director” under Section 162(m) of the
Internal Revenue Code (the “Code”).
Role of Compensation Consultants
6
 
The Compensation Committee has the authority to engage the services of outside consultants to assist in making decisions
regarding the establishment of Tesla’s compensation programs and philosophy. No such consultants were engaged by the
Compensation Committee or Tesla specifically with respect to executive or director compensation during 2019.
Role of Executive Officers in Compensation Decisions
Historically, for executive officers other than our Chief Executive Officer, the Compensation Committee has sought and
considered input from our Chief Executive Officer regarding such executive officers’ responsibilities, performance and
compensation. Specifically, our Chief Executive Officer recommends base salary increases and equity award levels for our senior
personnel, and advises the Compensation Committee regarding the compensation program’s ability to attract, retain and motivate
executive talent. These recommendations reflect compensation levels that our Chief Executive Officer believes are qualitatively
commensurate with an executive officer’s individual qualifications, experience, responsibility level, functional role, knowledge,
skills, and individual performance, as well as Tesla’s performance. The Compensation Committee considers our Chief Executive
Officer’s recommendations, but ultimately determines compensation in its judgment, and approves the specific compensation for all
of our executive officers (other than for our Chief Executive Officer, which is approved by the Board). All such compensation
determinations by our Compensation Committee are largely discretionary.
The Compensation Committee meets regularly in executive session. Our Chief Executive Officer is not present during
Compensation Committee deliberations or votes on his compensation and also recuses himself from sessions of the Board where
the Board acts on the Compensation Committee’s recommendations regarding his compensation. In addition, the Board has
established a management committee under the Tesla, Inc. 2019 Equity Incentive Plan (the “Equity Award Committee”) to grant
and administer equity awards, subject to certain maximum limits on the seniority of personnel to whom the Equity Award
Committee may grant awards and the value of any individual award. For example, the Equity Award Committee is not authorized to
grant awards to executive officer-level employees. Moreover, pursuant to applicable law, the Equity Award Committee may not
grant awards to its members, and the number of shares of our common stock underlying awards granted by it may not exceed
amounts determined by the Board from time to time. The Board has delegated to the Compensation Committee oversight authority
over the Equity Award Committee.
Role of Stockholder Say-on-Pay Votes
At the 2011, 2014 and 2017 annual meetings of our stockholders, we held triennial stockholder advisory “say-on-pay” votes
on the compensation of our named executive officers for the 2010, 2013 and 2016 fiscal years, respectively. Each time, our
stockholders overwhelmingly approved the compensation of our named executive officers, with over 94% of our stockholder votes
cast in favor of our compensation policies for our named executive officers. Given these results, and following consideration of
them, the Compensation Committee has decided to retain our overall approach to executive compensation while continuing to
evaluate our practices frequently, including in response to future say-on-pay votes. Moreover, we are required to hold a vote at least
every six years regarding how often to hold a stockholder advisory vote on the compensation of our named executive officers. We
held our most recent such vote at the 2017 annual meeting of stockholders, at which our stockholders indicated a preference for a
triennial vote. Consequently, the Board determined that we will hold a triennial stockholder advisory vote on the compensation of
our named executive officers until they consider the results of our next say-on-pay frequency vote, which will be held at the 2023
annual meeting of stockholders.
Clawback Policy
Our Corporate Governance Guidelines sets forth a compensation recovery (“clawback”) policy with respect to any annual
incentive payment or long-term incentive payment that may be received by an executive officer, where such payment would be
predicated upon achieving certain financial results that were subsequently the subject of a restatement of our financial statements,
and a lower payment would have been made to the executive based upon the restated financial results. In such case, the Board has
the authority to seek to recover from the executive officer the amount by which such officer’s incentive payments for the relevant
period exceeded the lower payment that would have been made based on the restated financial results.
7
 
Moreover, the terms of the performance-based stock option award granted to Elon Musk in January 2018 (the “2018 CEO
Performance Award”) include a clawback provision in the event of a restatement of our financial statements previously filed with
the SEC. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—2018 CEO Performance Award”
under this Item 11 below.
Current Elements of Named Executive Officer Compensation
Overview and Fiscal Year 2019 Company Highlights
Our current executive compensation program, which was developed and approved by the Compensation Committee,
generally consists of base salary, equity-based incentives and other benefits. We combine these elements in order to formulate
compensation packages that provide competitive pay and align the interests of our named executive officers with long-term
stockholder interests by rewarding the achievement of financial, operational and strategic objectives. In 2019, Tesla’s
accomplishments under our executive leadership included the following:
 • Total revenues of $24.6 billion, a year-over-year increase of approximately 15%;
 • Year-end cash and cash equivalents balance of $6.3 billion, an approximately 70% increase from the end of 2018;
 • Annual vehicle delivery and production records of 367,656 and 365,232 total vehicles, representing year-over-year
increases of approximately 50% and 43%, respectively;
 • 1.65 gigawatt hours of energy storage deployed in 2019, more than the aggregate of all prior years combined;
 • The beginning of the next phase of our global growth with the commencement of Model 3 production at Gigafactory
Shanghai in China, less than 10 months from breaking ground, and the selection of a site for a Gigafactory in Berlin,
Germany; and
 • The unveiling of Model Y and Cybertruck, the former of which we have recently commenced deliveries in the first
quarter of 2020, and the launch of the third generation of Solar Roof.
Base Salary
The Compensation Committee is responsible for reviewing our Chief Executive Officer’s and other executive officers’ base
salaries. The base salaries of all executive officers are reviewed annually and adjusted when necessary to reflect individual roles,
performance and the competitive market. Because we typically do not provide cash bonuses to our executive officers, salary is the
primary cash-based element of our executive officers’ compensation structure.
The following table sets forth information regarding the annualized base salary rates at the end of 2019 for our named
executive officers:
    
Named Executive Officer  Ending Fiscal 2019
Base Salary($)(1) 
Elon Musk  —(2)
Zachary Kirkhorn  275,000 
Jerome Guillen  300,000 
Andrew Baglino  300,000 
Deepak Ahuja  —(3)
 
(1) Reflects an annualized rate assuming 52 weeks each comprised of five work days.
(2) Mr. Musk historically earned a base salary that reflected the applicable minimum wage requirements under California law,
and he was subject to income taxes based on such base salary. However, he has never accepted his salary. Commencing in
May 2019 at Mr. Musk’s request, we eliminated altogether the earning and accrual of this base salary.
(3) Mr. Ahuja transitioned from his role as Chief Financial Officer effective March 2019.
8
 
Commencing in April 2020, the base salaries of our named executive officers were reduced by 30%. This reduction is part of
a company-wide reduction (subject to applicable laws) for salaried employees, which is intended to be a proactive and temporary
response to current global market conditions. The rate of reduction in base salary for our vice president-level and higher employees,
including our named executive officers, is higher than those applicable to all other salaried employees.
Equity-Based Incentives
Our equity award program is the primary vehicle for offering long-term incentives to our named executive officers. Our
equity-based incentives have historically been granted in the form of options to purchase shares of our common stock and restricted
stock unit awards that are settled in shares of our common stock upon vesting, and we have granted to our named executive officers
both awards that vest over a long-term period and awards that vest only upon the achievement of specified Tesla performance
milestones, in each case subject to continued service. We believe that equity awards more closely align the interests of our named
executive officers with our stockholders, provide our named executive officers with incentives linked to long-term performance,
and create an ownership culture. In addition, the vesting features of our equity awards contribute to executive retention because
these features provide an incentive to our named executive officers to remain in our employ during the scheduled vesting periods or
until the achievement of the applicable performance milestones, which are expected to be achieved over the medium- to long-term.
To date, we have not had an established set of criteria for granting equity awards; instead, the Compensation Committee exercises
its judgment and discretion, in consultation with our Chief Executive Officer and from time to time, a compensation consultant.
The Compensation Committee considers, among other things, the role and responsibility of the named executive officer,
competitive factors, the amount of stock-based equity compensation already held by the named executive officer, and the cash-
based compensation received by the named executive officer, to determine the level and types of equity awards that it approves.
The Compensation Committee meets periodically, including to approve equity award grants to our executives from time to
time. We do not have, nor do we plan to establish, any program, plan, or practice to time equity award grants in coordination with
releasing material non-public information. We generally grant one-time new hire equity awards to our employees upon their
commencement of employment with us, or upon their promotion to new positions. Additionally, as part of our ongoing executive
compensation review and alignment process, we periodically grant equity awards to our executives. For example, during 2019 we
granted a promotion award to Zachary Kirkhorn in connection with his promotion to Chief Financial Officer, and equity awards to
certain of our named executive officers pursuant to our executive compensation review and alignment process. For details on such
grants, see “Grants of Plan-Based Awards in 2019” under this Item 11 below.
Severance and Change in Control Benefits
No named executive officer has a severance or change in control arrangement with Tesla, other than the vesting of the 2018
CEO Performance Award based solely upon the achievement of market capitalization milestones as measured at the time of a
change in control of Tesla. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—2018 CEO
Performance Award” and “Potential Payments Upon Termination or Change in Control” under this Item 11 below.
Bonus
We do not currently have or have planned, and we typically have not historically entered into, any specific arrangements
with our named executive officers providing for cash-based bonus awards.
Non-Equity Incentive Plan Compensation
We did not provide any non-equity incentive plan compensation to any of our named executive officers in 2019, and we do
not currently have or have planned any specific arrangements with our named executive officers providing for non-equity incentive
plan compensation.
Perquisites
Generally, we do not provide any perquisites or other personal benefits to our named executive officers except in certain
limited circumstances.
Health and Welfare Benefits
We provide the following benefits to our named executive officers on the same basis provided to all of our employees:
9
 
 • health, dental and vision insurance;
 • life insurance and accidental death and dismemberment insurance;
 • a Section 401(k) plan for which no match by Tesla is provided;
 • an employee stock purchase plan;
 • short-and long-term disability insurance;
 • medical and dependent care flexible spending account; and
 • a health savings account.
Chief Executive Officer Compensation
Overview
Historically, in developing compensation recommendations for our Chief Executive Officer, the Compensation Committee
has sought both to appropriately reward our Chief Executive Officer’s previous and current contributions and to create incentives
for our Chief Executive Officer to continue to contribute significantly to successful results in the future. Each of the 2018 CEO
Performance Award and the performance-based stock option award granted to our Chief Executive Officer in August 2012 (the
“2012 CEO Performance Award”) is focused on this latter objective, as it solely rewards future performance.
In addition to serving as our Chief Executive Officer since October 2008, Elon Musk has contributed significantly and
actively to us since our earliest days in April 2004 by recruiting executives and engineers, contributing to vehicle engineering and
design, raising capital for us and bringing investors to us, and raising public awareness of Tesla.
Cash Compensation
Mr. Musk historically earned a base salary that reflected the applicable minimum wage requirements under California law,
and he was subject to income taxes based on such base salary. However, he has never accepted his salary. Commencing in May
2019 at Mr. Musk’s request, we eliminated altogether the earning and accrual of this base salary.
Historical Equity Compensation
Prior to stock option awards made in December 2009, Mr. Musk did not receive any equity compensation for his services for
a period of five years.
In 2010 and 2011, Mr. Musk did not receive any equity grants, because the Compensation Committee believed his existing
grants made in December 2009 already provided sufficient motivation for Mr. Musk to perform his duties as Chief Executive
Officer.
In August 2012, to create incentives for continued long-term success from the then-recently launched Model S program as
well as from Tesla’s then-planned Model X and Model 3 programs, and to further align executive compensation with increases in
stockholder value, the Board granted to Mr. Musk the 2012 CEO Performance Award, comprised of a stock option award to
purchase 5,274,901 shares of Tesla’s common stock, representing 5% of Tesla’s total issued and outstanding shares at the time of
grant. The 2012 CEO Performance Award consists of 10 equal vesting tranches, each requiring that Tesla meet a combination of
(i) the achievement of a specified operational milestone relating to development of Model X or Model 3, aggregate vehicle
production, or a gross margin target, and (ii) a sustained incremental $4 billion increase in Tesla’s market capitalization from $3.2
billion, Tesla’s market capitalization at the time of grant. The market capitalization conditions for all of the 10 vesting tranches and
9 of the 10 operational milestones have been achieved, and therefore 9 of 10 tranches under the 2012 CEO Performance Award
have vested. As of the date of this filing, only one operational milestone, requiring gross margin of 30% or more for four
consecutive quarters, has not been achieved and remains outstanding.
Prior to 2018, the only additional equity awards received by Mr. Musk related to certain immaterial awards granted during
2013 pursuant to a patent incentive program that was available to our employees generally.
10
 
2018 CEO Performance Award
Early in 2017, with the 2012 CEO Performance Award heading to substantial completion after having helped Tesla grow its
market capitalization to over $55 billion in just over five years, the independent members of the Board began preliminary
discussions regarding how to continue to incentivize Mr. Musk to lead Tesla through the next phase of its development. In January
2018, following more than six months of careful analysis and development led by the Compensation Committee, with participation
by every independent Board member, the help of Compensia, a national compensation consulting firm, and engagement with and
feedback from our largest institutional stockholders, the Board granted the 2018 CEO Performance Award to Mr. Musk. Such grant
was subject to approval by a majority of the total votes of Tesla common stock not owned by Mr. Musk or Kimbal Musk cast at a
meeting of the stockholders to approve the 2018 CEO Performance Award. On March 21, 2018, such approval was obtained, with
approximately 73% of the votes cast by such disinterested shares voting in favor of the 2018 CEO Performance Award.
The 2018 CEO Performance Award is comprised of a 10-year maximum term stock option to purchase 20,264,042 shares of
Tesla’s common stock, divided equally among 12 separate tranches that are each equivalent to 1% of the issued and outstanding
shares of Tesla’s common stock at the time of grant, at an exercise price of $350.02 per share. Each of the 12 vesting tranches of the
2018 CEO Performance Award will vest upon certification by the Board that both (i) the market capitalization milestone for such
tranche, which begins at $100 billion for the first tranche and increases by increments of $50 billion thereafter, and (ii) any one of
the following 8 operational milestones focused on revenue or 8 operational milestones focused on profitability, has been met:
   Total Revenue*
(in billions)  Adjusted EBITDA**
(in billions)
$20.0  $1.5
$35.0  $3.0
$55.0  $4.5
$75.0  $6.0
$100.0  $8.0
$125.0  $10.0
$150.0  $12.0
$175.0  $14.0
 
* “Revenue” means total revenues as reported in Tesla’s financial statements on Forms 10-Q or 10-K filed with the SEC for
the previous four consecutive fiscal quarters.
** “Adjusted EBITDA” means (i) net income (loss) attributable to common stockholders before (ii) interest expense, (iii)
(benefit) provision for income taxes, (iv) depreciation and amortization, and (v) stock-based compensation, as each such
item is reported in Tesla’s financial statements on Forms 10-Q or 10-K filed with the SEC for the previous four consecutive
fiscal quarters.
Any single operational milestone may only satisfy the vesting requirement of one tranche, together with the corresponding
market capitalization milestone. Subject to any applicable clawback provisions, policies or other forfeiture terms, once a milestone
is achieved, it is forever deemed achieved for determining the vesting of a tranche. Meeting more than 12 of the 16 operational
milestones will not result in any additional vesting or other compensation to Mr. Musk under the 2018 CEO Performance Award.
Except in a change in control situation, measurement of the market capitalization milestones will be based on both (i) a six calendar
month trailing average of Tesla’s stock price as well as (ii) a 30 calendar day trailing average of Tesla’s stock price, in each case
based on trading days only. Upon the consummation of certain acquisitions or split-up, spin-off or divestiture transactions, each
then-unachieved market capitalization milestone and/or operational milestone will be adjusted to offset the impact of such
transactions to the extent they could be considered material to the achievement of those milestones.
In establishing the Revenue and Adjusted EBITDA milestones, the Board carefully considered a variety of factors, including
Tesla’s growth trajectory and internal growth plans and the historical performance of other high-growth and high-multiples
companies in the technology space that have invested in new businesses and tangible assets. These benchmarks provided
revenue/EBITDA to market capitalization multiples, which were then used to inform the specific operational targets that aligned
with Tesla’s plans for future growth. Nevertheless, the Board considers each of the market capitalization and operational milestones
to be challenging hurdles. For example, in order to meet all 12 market capitalization milestones, Tesla will have to add
approximately $600 billion to its market
11
 
capitalization at the time of the grant of the 2018 CEO Performance Award, and in order to satisfy all eight revenue-based
operational milestones, Tesla would have to increase revenue by more than $163 billion from its annual revenue of approximately
$11.8 billion in 2017, the last fiscal year completed prior to the grant of the 2018 CEO Performance Award.
In addition, Mr. Musk must continue to lead Tesla as our Chief Executive Officer or, alternatively, as our Chief Product
Officer and Executive Chairman (with any other Chief Executive Officer reporting directly to him), at the time each milestone is
met in order for the corresponding tranche to vest. With limited exceptions, Mr. Musk must hold any shares that he acquires upon
exercise of the 2018 CEO Performance Award for at least five years post-exercise. There will be no acceleration of vesting of the
2018 CEO Performance award upon Mr. Musk’s termination, death or disability, or a change in control of Tesla. However, in a
change in control situation, the achievement of the milestones will be based solely on the market capitalization milestones, with the
measurement of Tesla’s market capitalization determined by the product of the total number of outstanding shares of Tesla common
stock immediately before the change in control multiplied by the greater of the last closing price of a share of Tesla common stock
before the effective time of the change in control or the per share price (plus the per share value of any other consideration)
received by Tesla’s stockholders in the change in control.
In the event of a restatement of Tesla’s financial statements previously filed with the SEC, if a lesser portion of the 2018
CEO Performance Award would have vested based on the restated financial results, then Tesla will require forfeiture (or repayment,
as applicable) of the portion of the 2018 CEO Performance Award that would not have vested based on the restated financial results
(less any amounts Mr. Musk may have paid to Tesla in exercising any forfeited awards). The 2018 CEO Performance Award also
will be subject, if more stringent than the foregoing, to any current or future Tesla clawback policy applicable to equity awards,
provided that the policy does not discriminate solely against Mr. Musk except as required by applicable law.
As of the date of this filing, two operational milestones—relating to (i) $20.0 billion total revenue and (ii) $1.5 billion
Adjusted EBITDA—have been achieved, subject to formal certification by the Board, and no market capitalization milestone has
been achieved. Consequently, no shares subject to the 2018 CEO Performance Award have vested as of the date of this filing.
However, if the value of Tesla’s closing stock price continues near the levels seen in late April 2020, the first market capitalization
milestone of $100 billion is expected to be met during the second quarter of 2020. In such event, upon certification by our Board of
Directors, the first tranche under the 2018 CEO Performance Award would vest and become exercisable, subject to Mr. Musk’s
payment of the exercise price of $350.02 per share and the minimum five-year holding period generally applicable to any shares he
acquires upon exercise.
Realized Compensation
For purposes of the table in “Summary Compensation Table” under this Item 11 below, we are required to report pursuant to
applicable SEC rules any stock option grants to Mr. Musk at values determined as of their respective grant dates and which are
driven by certain assumptions prescribed by Financial Accounting Board Accounting Standards Codification Topic 718,
“Compensation–Stock Compensation” (“ASC Topic 718”). Moreover, we are required to report in “Pay Ratio Disclosure” under
this Item 11 below (i) Mr. Musk’s annual total compensation, (ii) the median of the annual total compensation of all Tesla
employees qualifying for this analysis, other than Mr. Musk, in each case calculated pursuant to the methodology used for the table
under “Summary Compensation Table,” and (iii) the ratio of the former to the latter.
In addition, we are required to report in “2019 Option Exercises and Stock Vested” under this Item 11 below an amount for
the “value realized” upon: (i) any exercise by Mr. Musk of a stock option, which is based on the difference between the market
price of the underlying shares at the time of exercise and the exercise price of the stock option, and (ii) any vesting of a restricted
stock unit award, based on the market price of the award at the time of vesting. Such amount is required to be reported even if
Mr. Musk does not actually receive any cash from such exercise or vesting, either because he does not also sell any shares or
because he sells only a number of shares sufficient to cover the related tax liabilities resulting from the exercise or vesting.
As a result, there may be a significant disconnect between what is reported as compensation for Mr. Musk in a given year in
such sections and the value actually realized as compensation in that year or over a period of time.
12
 
Moreover, the vast majority of compensation in respect of past stock option grants to Mr. Musk, including the 2012 CEO
Performance Award and the 2018 CEO Performance Award, were incentives for future performance and their value is realizable
only if Tesla’s stock price appreciates compared to the dates of the grants, and if the Company achieves applicable vesting
requirements.
To supplement the disclosures in “Summary Compensation Table,” “Pay Ratio Disclosure” and “2019 Option Exercises and
Stock Vested” under this Item 11 below, we have included the following table, which shows the total realized compensation of
Mr. Musk for the last three fiscal years, as well as the ratio of Mr. Musk’s realized compensation to the median of the annual total
compensation of all other Tesla employees qualifying for this analysis as reported under “Pay Ratio Disclosure.” Realized
compensation is not a substitute for reported compensation in evaluating our compensation structure, but we believe that realized
compensation is an important factor in understanding that the value of compensation that Mr. Musk ultimately realizes is dependent
on a number of additional factors, including: (i) the vesting of certain of his option awards only upon the successful achievement of
a number of market capitalization increase and operational milestone targets, including milestones that have not yet been achieved
under each of the 2012 CEO Performance Award and the 2018 CEO Performance Award; (ii) the fact that Mr. Musk does not
receive any cash if he does not actually sell shares and thereby reduce his investment in us, and he does not receive any cash to the
extent that he sells only shares sufficient to cover income taxes with respect to his awards (including stock options exercised solely
to avoid their expiration in accordance with their terms); and (iii) the then-current market value of our common stock at the times at
which Mr. Musk may elect to actually sell his shares.
 
Year   “Total Compensation” of
CEO,
as Reported in Summary
Compensation Table
Below
($)    “Value Realized on Exercise
or Vesting of Awards” of
CEO, as
Reported in Option Exercises
and Stock Vested Table
Below
($)   Median Annual Total
Compensation of all
Qualifying Non-CEO
Employees,
as reported in Pay
Ratio Disclosure
Section Below
($)  Total CEO Realized
Compensation
($)(1)(2)  Ratio of Total CEO
Realized
Compensation to
Median Annual
Total
Compensation of
all Qualifying Non-CEO
Employees
2019  23,760 (3)  30,483,250 (4)  58,455  23,760  0.41:1
2018  2,284,044,884 (5)  —  56,163  56,380  1.00:1
2017  49,920   —  54,816 49,920  0.91:1
 
(1)“Total CEO realized compensation” for a given year is defined as (i) the amounts reported for Mr. Musk in “Summary
Compensation Table” under this Item 11 below under the columns “Salary,” “Bonus,” “Non‑Equity Incentive Plan
Compensation” and “All Other Compensation,” plus (ii) with respect to any stock option exercised by Mr. Musk in such
year in connection with which shares of stock were also sold other than to satisfy any resulting tax liability, the difference
between the market price of such shares at the time of exercise and the applicable exercise price of the option, plus (iii) with
respect to any restricted stock unit vested by Mr. Musk in such year in connection with which shares of stock were also sold
other than automatic sales to satisfy any withholding obligations related to such vesting, the market price of such shares at
the time of vesting, plus (iv) any cash actually received by Mr. Musk in respect of any shares sold to cover tax liabilities as
described in (ii) and (iii) above, following the payment of such tax liabilities.
(2) Of the amounts noted, Mr. Musk has not accepted his salary in the amounts of $23,760, $56,380, and $49,920 for 2019,
2018, and 2017, respectively.
(3) Reflects the applicable minimum wage requirements under California law for part of 2019. Commencing in May 2019 at Mr.
Musk’s request, we eliminated altogether the earning and accrual of this base salary.
(4) Reflects the exercise of a vested stock option award as to which Mr. Musk paid the exercise price in cash. None of the shares
received upon exercise have been sold, and therefore this amount has not been received by Mr. Musk.
(5) Includes $2,283,988,504 attributed to the 2018 CEO Performance Award, which is intended to compensate Mr. Musk over
its 10-year maximum term and will become vested as to all shares subject to it only if our market capitalization increases to
$650.0 billion and 12 of 16 total operational milestones are achieved during such 10-year period. Each tranche of 1/12th of
the total number of shares subject to the option will become vested and exercisable each time: (i) our market capitalization
increases initially to $100.0 billion for the first tranche, and by an additional $50.0 billion for each tranche thereafter; and
(ii) one of 16 specified operational milestones relating to total revenue or adjusted EBITDA (other than an operating
milestone that previously counted towards the vesting of another tranche) is attained, subject to Mr. Musk’s continued
service to us as either CEO or as both Executive Chairman and Chief Product Officer, with the CEO reporting to him, at
each
13
 
such vesting event. This award was designed to be entirely an incentive for future performance that would take many years,
if at all, to be achieved. Further, each of the requirements underlying the performance milestones was selected to be very
difficult to achieve. If any options have not vested by the end of the term of the option award, they will be forfeited and Mr.
Musk will not realize the value of such options. As of the date of this filing, zero market capitalization milestones have been
achieved and two operational milestones have been achieved (subject to Board certification) and consequently, no shares
have vested under the 2018 CEO Performance Award. Following vesting, the actual receipt of any shares by Mr. Musk will
further be subject to his payment of the exercise price of $350.02 per share. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—
Chief Executive Officer Compensation—2018 CEO Performance Award” under this Item 11 above.
 
Tax and Accounting Considerations
Sections 280G and 409A. We have not provided or committed to provide any executive officer or director with a gross-up or
other reimbursement for tax amounts the executive might pay pursuant to Section 280G or Section 409A of the Code. Section 280G
and related Code sections provide that executive officers, directors who hold significant stockholder interests and certain other
service providers could be subject to significant additional taxes if they receive payments or benefits in connection with a change in
control of Tesla that exceeds certain limits, and that we or our successor could lose a deduction on the amounts subject to the
additional tax. Section 409A also imposes additional significant taxes on the individual in the event that an executive officer,
director or service provider of certain types receives “deferred compensation” that does not meet the requirements of Section 409A.
Tax Deduction Limit. Section 162(m) of the Code generally disallows a tax deduction to public corporations for
compensation greater than $1,000,000 paid in any fiscal year to certain executive officers. However, prior to the enactment of U.S.
tax legislation in December 2017 (the “Tax Act”), certain types of performance-based compensation were excluded from the
$1,000,000 deduction limit if specific requirements were met. Under the Tax Act, this exclusion for performance-based
compensation is not available with respect to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, unless the compensation is pursuant
to a written binding contract which was in effect on or before November 2, 2017, and which is not modified in any material respect
on or after such date. Pursuant to the Tax Act, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, Section 162(m) of the Code
was expanded to cover additional executive officers and other employees, including the chief financial officer, so that the
compensation of the chief executive officer and chief financial officer (at any time during the fiscal year), the three next most
highly compensated executive officers during the taxable year and any other individual who was considered a “covered employee”
for any prior taxable year that begins after 2016, will be subject to the $1,000,000 deductibility limit under Section 162(m) of the
Code. Commencing with our 2018 fiscal year, to the extent that the aggregate amount of any covered officer’s salary, bonus, any
amount realized from certain option exercises and vesting of restricted stock units or other equity awards, and certain other
compensation amounts that are recognized as taxable income by the officer exceeds $1,000,000, we will not be entitled to a U.S.
federal income tax deduction for the amount over $1,000,000 in that year, unless the compensation qualifies for the transition relief
applicable to certain written binding contracts in effect on or before November 2, 2017. The Compensation Committee has not
adopted a formal policy regarding tax deductibility of compensation paid to our executive officers.
Accounting Implications. We follow ASC Topic 718 for our stock-based compensation awards. ASC Topic 718 requires
companies to measure the compensation expense for all stock-based compensation awards made to employees and directors based
on the grant date “fair value” of these awards. This calculation is performed for accounting purposes and reported in the
compensation tables below, even though our named executive officers may never realize any value from their awards. ASC Topic
718 also requires companies to recognize the compensation cost of their stock-based compensation awards in their income
statements over the period that an executive officer is required to render service in exchange for the option or other award.
14
 
Compensation Committee Report
The Compensation Committee oversees Tesla’s compensation programs, policies and practices. The Compensation
Committee has reviewed and discussed the Compensation Discussion and Analysis required by Item 402(b) of Regulation S-K with
management. Based on such review and discussions, the Compensation Committee has recommended to the Board that the
Compensation Discussion and Analysis be included in this Amendment and Tesla’s proxy statement relating to its 2020 annual
meeting of stockholders.
Respectfully submitted by the members of the Compensation Committee of the Board
Ira Ehrenpreis (Chair)
Robyn Denholm
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson
 
15
 
Summary Compensation Table
The following table presents information concerning the total compensation of our named executive officers for each of the
last three fiscal years. No disclosure is provided for fiscal years for which those persons were not named executive officers.
 
Name and Principal Position  Year Salary
($)  Bonus
($) Stock Awards
($)(1)  Option
Awards
($)(2)  Non-Equity
Incentive Plan
Compensation
($)  All Other
Compensation
($)  Total
($)
Elon Musk  2019  23,760 (3) — — — — — 23,760
Chief Executive Officer  2018  56,380  — — 2,283,988,504 (4) — — 2,284,044,884
  2017  49,920  — — —  — — 49,920
Zachary Kirkhorn  2019  276,058  — 5,019,998  15,947,901  — — 21,243,957
Chief Financial Officer                 
Jerome Guillen  2019  301,154  — — 7,965,058  — — 8,266,212
President, Automotive  2018  301,154  — — 17,450,897  — — 17,752,051
Andrew Baglino  2019  301,154  — — 4,779,080  — — 5,080,234
SVP, Powertrain and
Ener gy Engineering                
Deepak Ahuja(5)  2019  176,870  — — —  — — 176,870
Former Chief Financial  2018  501,923  — — 5,708,430  — — 6,210,353
Officer  2017  428,846  — 10,501,859  4,567,304  — — 15,498,009
 
(1) This column reflects the grant date fair value computed in accordance with ASC Topic 718 of the restricted stock unit
awards granted to the named executive officers, which is measured on the grant date based on the closing fair market value
of our common stock. These amounts do not necessarily correspond to the actual value that may be recognized by the named
executive officers, which depends, among other things, on the market value of our common stock.
(2) This column reflects the aggregate grant date fair value computed in accordance with ASC Topic 718 of the options to
purchase shares of our common stock granted to the named executive officers. The assumptions used in the valuation of
these awards are set forth in Note 14, Equity Incentive Plans, to the consolidated financial statements included in the
Original Form 10-K. These amounts do not necessarily correspond to the actual value that may be recognized by the named
executive officers, which depends, among other things, on the market value of our common stock appreciating from that on
the grant date(s) of the option(s).
(3) Reflects the applicable minimum wage requirements under California law for part of 2019. Commencing in May 2019 at Mr.
Musk’s request, we eliminated altogether the earning and accrual of this base salary.
(4) Reflects the 2018 CEO Performance Award, which is intended to compensate Mr. Musk over its 10-year maximum term and
will become vested as to all shares subject to it only if our market capitalization increases to $650.0 billion and 12 of 16 total
operational milestones are achieved during such 10-year period. Each tranche of 1/12th of the total number of shares subject
to the option will become vested and exercisable each time: (i) our market capitalization increases initially to $100.0 billion
for the first tranche, and by an additional $50.0 billion for each tranche thereafter; and (ii) one of 16 specified operational
milestones relating to total revenue or adjusted EBITDA (other than an operating milestone that previously counted towards
the vesting of another tranche) is attained, subject to Mr. Musk’s continued service to us as either CEO or as both Executive
Chairman and Chief Product Officer, with the CEO reporting to him, at each such vesting event. This award was designed to
be entirely an incentive for future performance that would take many years, if at all, to be achieved. Further, each of the
requirements underlying the performance milestones was selected to be very difficult to achieve. If any options have not
vested by the end of the term of the option award, they will be forfeited and Mr. Musk will not realize the value of such
options. As of the date of this filing, zero market capitalization milestones have been achieved and two operational
milestones have been achieved (subject to Board certification) and consequently, no shares have vested under the 2018 CEO
Performance Award. Following vesting, the actual receipt of any shares by Mr. Musk will further be subject to his payment
of the exercise price of $350.02 per share. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer
Compensation—2018 CEO Performance Award” and “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer
Compensation—Realized Compensation” under this Item 11 above.
(5) Mr. Ahuja transitioned from his role as Chief Financial Officer effective March 2019.
16
 
Pay Ratio Disclosure
Tesla is committed to fair and competitive compensation for our employees. Moreover, Elon Musk, our Chief Executive
Officer, has agreed to a compensation arrangement in the 2018 CEO Performance Award that is substantially tied to the
appreciation of our market capitalization. Because equity awards are available to all Tesla employees, this also means that Mr.
Musk’s compensation is tied to the success of Tesla employees. We are providing a ratio of (i) Mr. Musk’s 2019 annual total
compensation to (ii) the median of the 2019 annual total compensation of all applicable qualifying Tesla employees other than Mr.
Musk, as if all of such employees were named executive officers, in each case calculated pursuant to the disclosure requirements of
“Summary Compensation Table” above.
Mr. Musk’s 2019 annual total compensation, as reported under “Summary Compensation Table,” was $23,760, and the
median 2019 annual total compensation of all other qualifying employees, as determined pursuant to the methodology set forth
below, was $58,455. Consequently, the applicable ratio of such amounts for 2019 was 0.41:1.
Our methodology for identifying the median of the 2019 annual total compensation for each individual other than Mr. Musk
was as follows:
 • We determined that as of December 31, 2019, Tesla and all of our subsidiaries had 44,452 individuals qualifying for
this analysis (full-time, part-time and temporary employees other than Mr. Musk, subject to the following bullet), of
which approximately 27% were based outside of the U.S. and approximately 33% were production line employees.
 • We did not include in the population of qualifying individuals any employees of staffing agencies whose
compensation is determined by such agencies.
 • We applied the requirements and assumptions required for the table under “Summary Compensation Table” above for
each of such individuals as if he or she was a named executive officer to calculate the total annual compensation,
including base salary or wages, performance-based commission payments, and equity awards based on their grant
date fair values.
 • We converted any payment earned or paid in a foreign currency to U.S. dollar using the average of the prevailing
conversion rates for the month of December 2019.
 • We selected the median of all total annual compensation amounts calculated in accordance with the foregoing.
17
 
Grants of Plan-Based Awards in 2019
The following table presents information concerning each grant of an award made to a named executive officer in fiscal
2019 under any plan.
 
                All Other
Stock   All Other
Option   Exercise
or     
                Awards:  Awards:   Base     
    Estimated Future Payouts Under  Number of  Number of  Price of  Grant Date Fair 
    Non-Equity Incentive Plan Awards  Shares of  Securities  Option  Value of Stock  
Name Grant
Date(1)  Threshold
($)   Target
($)  Maximum
($)   Stocks or
Units (#)  Underlying
Options(#)  Awards
($/Sh)  and Option
Awards ($) 
Zachary J. Kirkhorn  1/22/2019 (2) —  —  —  —  10,886   298.92  1,452,638  
  1/22/2019 (2) —  —  —  3,629   —  — 1,084,781  
  4/19/2019 (3) —  —  —  —  129,609   273.26  14,495,263  
  4/19/2019 (3) —  —  —  14,401   —  — 3,935,217  
Jerome Guillen  7/19/2019 (2) —  —  —  —  70,186   258.18  7,965,058  
Andrew Baglino  7/19/2019 (2) —  —  —  —  42,112  258.18  4,779,080  
 
(1) The vesting schedule applicable to each outstanding award is set forth in “Outstanding Equity Awards at 2019 Fiscal Year-
End” under this Item 11 below.
(2) This award was granted as part of Tesla’s ongoing executive compensation review and alignment process.
(3) This award was granted in connection with Mr. Kirkhorn’s promotion to Chief Financial Officer.
Outstanding Equity Awards at 2019 Fiscal Year-End
The following table presents information concerning unexercised options and unvested restricted stock unit awards for each
named executive officer outstanding as of the end of fiscal 2019.
 
  Option Awards   Stock Awards  
Name  Grant Date   Number  of
Securities
Underlying
Unexer cised
Options (#)
Exer cisable   Number  of
Securities
Underlying
Unexer cised
Options (#)
Unexer cisable   Equity
Incentive
Plan
Awards:
Number  of
Securities
Underlying
Unexer cised
Unearned
Options (#)   Option
Exer cise
Price ($)   Option
Expiration
Date   Number  of
Shar es or
Units of
Stock That
Have Not
Vested
(#)   Market
Value of
Shar es or
Units of Stock
That Have
Not Vested
($)(1)  
Elon Musk   3/21/2018(2)  —   —   20,264,042   350.02   1/19/2028   —   — 
   6/10/2013(3)  350       —   100.05   6/10/2023   —   — 
   4/8/2013(3)  350   —   —   41.83   4/8/2023   —   — 
   8/13/2012(4)  4,572,410   —   527,491   31.17   8/13/2022   —   — 
Zachary J. Kirkhorn   4/19/2019(5)  24,302   105,307   —   273.26   4/19/2029   —   — 
   4/19/2019(6)  —   —   —   —   —   12,600   5,270,958 
   1/22/2019(7)  2,177   8,709   —   298.92   1/22/2029   —   — 
   1/22/2019(8)  —   —   —   —   —   2,904   1,214,830 
   10/16/2018(9)  603   1,982   —   276.59   10/16/2028   —   — 
   10/16/2018(8)  —   —   —   —   —   690   288,648 
   11/13/2017(10)  —   —   —   —   —   437   182,810 
   5/8/2017(11)  —   —   —   —   —   431   180,300 
   9/12/2016(12)  —   —   —   —   —   220   92,033 
   5/9/2016(13)  —   —   —   —   —   155   64,841 
   1/10/2011(14)  2,000   —   —   28.45   1/10/2021   —   — 
Jerome Guillen   7/19/2019(15)  7,019   63,167   —   258.18   7/19/2029   —   — 
   10/16/2018(16)  24,125   79,270   —   276.59   10/16/2028   —   — 
   2/12/2018(17)  16,500   28,500   —   315.73   2/12/2028   —   — 
   10/9/2017(18)  3,873   —   7,748   342.94   10/9/2027   —   — 
   8/14/2017(14)  5,322   3,802   —   363.80   8/13/2027   —   — 
   4/10/2017(11)  —   —       —   —   1,453   607,833 
   6/13/2016(19)  6,823   —   20,470   217.87   6/13/2026   —   — 
   6/13/2016(13)  —   —   —   —   —   569   238,030 
   1/13/2014(20)  6,500   —   13,750   139.34   1/13/2024   —   — 
Andrew Baglino   7/19/2019(21)  4,211   37,901   —   258.18   7/19/2029   —   — 
   10/16/2018(9)  2,412   7,928   —   276.59   10/16/2028   —   — 
   10/16/2018(8)  —   —   —   —   —   2,758   1,153,754 
18
 
   3/19/2018(22)  5,500   9,500   —   313.56   3/19/2028   —   — 
   2/20/2018(23)  —   —   —   —   —   1,662   695,264 
   1/11/2016(14)  7,762   552   —   207.85   1/11/2026   —   — 
   1/11/2016(24)  —   —   —   —   —   552   230,918 
   11/10/2014(20)  4,518   —   2,500   241.93   11/10/2024   —   — 
Deepak Ahuja (25)   —   —   —       —   —   —   — 
 
(1) The market value of unvested restricted stock units is calculated by multiplying the number of unvested restricted stock units
held by the applicable named executive officer by the closing price of our common stock on December 31, 2019, which was
$418.33.
(2) 1/12th of the total number of shares subject to the option will become vested and exercisable each time: (i) our market
capitalization increases initially to $100.0 billion for the first tranche, and by an additional $50.0 billion for each tranche
thereafter; and (ii) one of 16 specified operational milestones relating to total revenue or adjusted EBITDA (other than an
operating milestone that previously counted towards the vesting of another tranche) is attained, subject to Mr. Musk’s
continued service to us as either CEO or as both Executive Chairman and Chief Product Officer, with the CEO reporting to
him, at each such vesting event. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—
2018 CEO Performance Award” under this Item 11 above.
(3) Stock option awards granted as part of our company-wide patent incentive program. The total number of shares subject to
the option was vested and exercisable on the applicable grant date of the option.
(4) 1/10th of the total number of shares subject to the option became and will become vested and exercisable each time: (i) our
market capitalization increases by $4.0 billion above the initially measured market capitalization of $3.2 billion; and (ii) one
of 10 specified performance milestones relating to the development of our Model X and Model 3 vehicles and our total
production of vehicles is attained, subject to Mr. Musk’s continued service to us at each such vesting event. If any shares
have not vested by the end of the term of the option, they will be forfeited and Mr. Musk will not realize the value of such
shares. As of the date of this filing, 10 market capitalization milestones and nine performance milestones have been
achieved. See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—Historical Equity
Compensation” under this Item 11 above.
(5) 1/8th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on September 13, 2019, and 1/48th of the shares
subject to the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on
each such vesting date.
(6) 1/8th of this award became vested on December 5, 2019, and 1/16th of this award becomes vested every three months
thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(7) 1/60th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on January 5, 2019, and 1/60th of the shares subject
to the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each
such vesting date.
(8) 1/20th of this award vested on March 5, 2019, and 1/20th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(9) 1/60th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on November 1, 2018, and 1/60th of the shares
subject to the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on
each such vesting date.
(10)1/16th of this award vested on December 5, 2017, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(11)1/16th of this award vested on September 5, 2017, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to
the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(12)1/16th of this award vested on December 5, 2016, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(13)1/16th of this award vested on September 5, 2016, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to
the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(14)1/48th of the shares subject to the option vested or shall vest monthly starting on the one-month anniversary of the
applicable grant date, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(15)1/10th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on December 24, 2019, and 1/60th of the shares
subject to the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on
each such vesting date.
19
 
(16)1/10th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on April 1, 2019, and 1/60th of the shares subject to
the option become vested and exercisable every month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each
such vesting date.
(17)1/60th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on March 12, 2018, and 1/60th of the shares subject
to the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each
such vesting date.
(18)1/3rd of the shares subject to the option became or will become vested and exercisable upon the achievement, as determined
by the Board, of each of three specified performance goals relating to weekly or cumulative deliveries of certain of our
current and future vehicles, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(19)1/4th of the shares subject to the option became or will become vested and exercisable upon the achievement, as determined
by the Board, of each of four specified performance goals relating to the development, cumulative deliveries, and cumulative
revenues for certain of our vehicles, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date
(20)1/4th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable upon each of the following, as determined by the
Board: (i) the completion of the first Model X production vehicle; (ii) aggregate vehicle production of 100,000 vehicles in a
trailing 12-month period; and (iii) completion of the first Model 3 production vehicle. 1/4 of the shares subject to this option
will become vested and exercisable upon the determination by the Board that annualized gross margin of greater than 30.0%
in any three years is achieved, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(21)1/60th of the total shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on July 24, 2019, and 1/60th of the shares
subject to the option become vested and exercisable every month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us
on each such vesting date.
(22)1/60th of the shares subject to the option became vested and exercisable on March 27, 2018, and 1/60th of the shares subject
to the option become vested and exercisable each month thereafter, subject to the grantee’s continued service to us on each
such vesting date.
(23)1/16th of this award vested on June 5, 2018, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(24)1/16th of this award vested on June 5, 2016, and 1/16th of this award vests every three months thereafter, subject to the
grantee’s continued service to us on each such vesting date.
(25)Mr. Ahuja transitioned from his role as Chief Financial Officer effective March 2019.
 
 
20
  
2019 Option Exercises and Stock Vested
The following table presents information concerning each exercise of stock options and vesting of stock awards during fiscal
2019 for each of the named executive officers.
 
   Option Awards   Stock Awards  
Name   Number of Shares
Acquired on Exercise
(#)    Value Realized  on
Exercise
($)(1)   Number of Shares
Acquired  on Vesting
(#)    Value Realized  on
Vesting
($)(2)  
Elon Musk   175,000    30,483,250 (3)  —   — 
Zachary Kirkhorn   —   —   2,311   763,485  
   —   —   510   117,086  
 
  —
   —
   508   99,868
  
   —   —   540   149,332  
Jerome Guillen   1,000    166,760    —   — 
   1,000    166,080    —   — 
   1,000    167,410    —   — 
   8,000    1,325,280    —   — 
   2,000    353,960    —   — 
   2,000    380,120    —   — 
   —   —   526   173,775  
   —   —   527   120,989  
   —   —   527   103,603  
   —   —   526   145,460  
Andrew Baglino   2,000    210,349    —   — 
   —   —   909   300,306  
   —   —   909   208,688  
   —   —   908   178,504  
   —   —   909   251,375  
Deepak Ahuja (4)   —   —   2,667    737,532  
 
(1) Reflects the product of the number of shares of stock subject to the exercised option multiplied by the difference between the
market price of our common stock at the time of exercise on the exercise date and the exercise price of the option.
(2) Reflects the product of the number of shares of stock vested multiplied by the market price of our common stock on the
vesting date.
(3) None of the shares received upon exercise have been sold, and therefore this amount has not been received by Mr. Musk.
See “Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—Realized Compensation” under this
Item 11 above.
(4) Mr. Ahuja transitioned from his role as Chief Financial Officer effective March 2019.
Potential Payments Upon Termination or Change in Control
We do not have an employment agreement for any specific term with any of our named executive officers. Moreover, we do
not have any contract, agreement, plan or arrangement that would result in payments to a named executive officer at, following, or
in connection with any termination of employment, including resignation, severance, retirement or a constructive termination of
employment of a named executive officer, or a change in control of Tesla (other than the vesting of the 2018 CEO Performance
Award based solely upon the achievement of market capitalization milestones as measured at the time of a change in control of
Tesla, which by its nature cannot be estimated at this time) or a change in the named executive officer’s responsibilities. See also
“Compensation Discussion and Analysis—Chief Executive Officer Compensation—2018 CEO Performance Award” under this Item
11 above.
Employee Compensation Risks
The Compensation Committee oversees management of risks relating to Tesla’s compensation plans and programs. Tesla’s
management and the Compensation Committee have assessed the risks associated with Tesla’s compensation policies and practices
for all employees, including non-executive officers. These include risks relating
21
 
to setting ambitious targets for our employees’ compensation or the vesting of their equity awards and our emphasis on at-risk
equity-based compensation, and the potential impact of such practices on the retention or decision-making of our employees,
particularly our senior management. Based on the results of this assessment, Tesla does not believe that its compensation policies
and practices for all employees, including non-executive officers, create risks that are reasonably likely to have a material adverse
effect on Tesla.
Compensation of Directors
2019 Director Compensation Table
The following table provides information concerning the compensation paid by us to each of our non-employee directors
who served during any part of fiscal year 2019. Elon Musk, who is our Chief Executive Officer, does not receive additional
compensation for his services as a director.
The awards with respect to which values are provided under the column “Option Awards” below are exclusively stock
options, which have realizable value only if they actually vest over time and to the extent, if any, that our stock price exceeds the
applicable exercise prices. The values provided below for these awards are based on applicable accounting standards, and do not
necessarily reflect the actual amounts realized or realizable pursuant to the underlying stock options.  
                  
Name   Fees Earned or
Paid in Cash
($)    Option Awards
($)(1)(2)(3) 
  All Other
Compensation  
Total
($)
Robyn Denholm   191,257 (4)  2,524,440 (4) 27,982 (5)  2,743,679  
Ira Ehrenpreis   37,500    —  —   37,500  
Lawrence J. Ellison   20,000    5,848,976   —   5,868,976  
Antonio Gracias   25,240    —  —   25,240  
Stephen Jurvetson   19,265    1,184,605   —   1,203,870  
James Murdoch   32,500    —  —   32,500  
Kimbal Musk   20,000    —      20,000  
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson   27,005    7,329,733   —   7,356,738  
Brad Buss(6)   15,310    —  —   15,310  
Linda Johnson Rice(6)   11,196    —  —   11,196  
 
(1) As of December 31, 2019, the aggregate number of shares underlying option awards outstanding for each of our non-
employee directors with such awards was:
 
Name   Aggr egate Number  of
Shar es Underlying
Options Outstanding  
Robyn Denholm   206,165  
Ira Ehrenpreis   148,000  
Lawrence J. Ellison   58,334  
Antonio Gracias   202,000  
Stephen Jurvetson   12,000  
James Murdoch   84,668  
Kimbal Musk   50,000  
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson   73,334  
 
(2) Reflects the aggregate grant date fair value computed in accordance with ASC Topic 718. The assumptions used in the
valuation of option awards are set forth in the notes to our consolidated financial statements, which are included in Note 14,
Equity Incentive Plans, to the consolidated financial statements included in the Original Form 10-K. These amounts do not
necessarily correspond to the actual value that may be recognized by our non-employee directors, which depends, among
other things, on the market value of our common stock appreciating from that on the grant date(s) of the option(s).
Following vesting, the actual receipt of any shares by each recipient will further be subject to his payment of the applicable
exercise price.
22
 
(3) Reflects stock option grants for service on the Board or as members or chairs of Board committees that were automatically
granted pursuant to our non-employee director compensation policy. Prior to February 2020, such stock options were
generally granted automatically once every three years, and such awards vest monthly over three years, subject to continued
service. See “Compensation of Directors—Non-Employee Director Compensation Arrangements” under this Item 11 below
for more detail.
(4) Reflects compensation for service as Chair of the Board, including a cash retainer and an automatic stock option grant,
approved by the Board. See “Compensation of Directors—Non-Employee Director Compensation Arrangements” under this
Item 11 below for more detail.
(5) Consists of reimbursements for out-of-pocket travel expenses incurred in connection with Board service, including
attendance at Board or Board committee meetings.
(6) Board term ended in June 2019 without standing for re-election at the 2019 annual meeting of stockholders.
Non-Employee Director Compensation Arrangements
Our director compensation policy that is applicable to all of Tesla’s non-employee directors is designed to be consistent with
our compensation philosophy for our employees, with an emphasis on equity-based compensation over cash in order to align the
value of their compensation with the market value of our stock, and consequently, with the long-term interests of our stockholders.
Moreover, while we offer to our employees restricted stock units, which tend to retain some value even if the market value of our
stock decreases, the equity-based compensation to our directors is exclusively in the form of stock options, which have value only
to the extent, if any, that our stock price increases following their grant. Consequently, a large portion of our non-employee
directors’ compensation is entirely at risk.
Our current director compensation policy provides that each non-employee director will receive the following compensation
for Board and Board committee services, as applicable. Historically, automatically granted stock option awards for such services
were made only once every three years, vesting in equal monthly tranches over such period. In February 2020, the Board amended
the director compensation policy with prospective effectiveness, such that future stock option awards to purchase one-third of the
previously applicable numbers of shares will be automatically granted annually, in lieu of such triennial grants.
 • an annual cash retainer for general Board service of $20,000;
 • no cash awards for attendance of general Board meetings;
 • an annual cash retainer for serving as the chair of the Audit Committee of $15,000, for serving as the chair of the
Compensation Committee of $10,000 and for serving as the chair of the Nominating and Corporate Governance
Committee of $7,500;
 • an annual cash retainer for serving on the Audit Committee of $7,500 per member, for serving on the Compensation
Committee of $5,000 per member, and for serving on the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of
$5,000 per member;
 • upon first joining the Board, an automatic initial grant of a stock option to purchase a number of shares of our
common stock equal to 1,389 multiplied by the number of months (rounded up to a whole number) between the date
on which such director joined the Board and the first June 18 following such date (the “Initial Annual Award Grant
Date”), vesting 100% on the Initial Annual Award Grant Date (subject to continued service through such date);
 • (i) on the Initial Annual Award Grant Date, or for a director who was previously granted an outstanding stock option
for Board service to purchase 50,000 shares of our common stock vesting monthly over three years, the date on which
such award fully vests, and (ii) in either case every year thereafter, an automatic grant of a stock option to purchase
16,668 shares of our common stock;
 • for serving as the lead independent director, (i) shortly following appointment as the lead independent director, or for
a director who was previously granted an outstanding stock option for such service to purchase 24,000 shares of our
common stock vesting monthly over three years, the date on which such award fully vests, and (ii) in either case
every year thereafter, an automatic grant of a stock option to purchase 8,000 shares of our common stock;
23
 
 • for serving as a member of the Audit Committee, the Compensation Committee or the Nominating and Corporate
Governance Committee, (i) shortly following appointment as a member of such Committee, or for a director who was
previously granted an outstanding stock option for such service to purchase 12,000 shares, 9,000 shares, or 6,000
shares, respectively, of our common stock vesting monthly over three years, the date on which such award fully vests,
and (ii) in either case every year thereafter, an automatic grant of a stock option to purchase 4,000 shares, 3,000
shares, or 2,000 shares, respectively, of our common stock; and
 • in addition to any applicable grant in the immediately preceding bullet, for serving as the chair of the Audit
Committee, the Compensation Committee or the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee, (i) shortly
following appointment as the chair of such Committee, or for a director who was previously granted an outstanding
stock option for such service to purchase 12,000 shares, 6,000 shares, or 3,000 shares, respectively, of our common
stock vesting monthly over three years, the date on which such award fully vests, and (ii) in either case every year
thereafter, an automatic grant of a stock option to purchase 4,000 shares, 2,000 shares, or 1,000 shares, respectively,
of our common stock.
Unless noted above, each automatic stock option grant for service as a member of the Board, lead independent director,
member of a Board committee or chair of a Board committee, in each case as described above, will vest in equal monthly tranches
for over one year (or, for awards granted prior to the amendment of the director compensation policy in February 2020, over three
years) starting on the one month anniversary of the vesting commencement date, subject to continued service in the capacity for
which such grant was made (except that if a director who was granted such an option ceases to be a director on the day before an
annual meeting that is held earlier than the anniversary date of the vesting commencement date for that calendar year, vesting will
accelerate with respect to the shares that would have vested if such director continued service through such anniversary date).
In addition, the Board has approved the following additional compensation arrangements for Robyn Denholm for her service
as Chair of the Board, commencing on July 1, 2019:
 • an annual cash retainer of $300,000; and
 • an automatic annual grant of a stock option to purchase 8,000 shares of our common stock, which will vest 1/12th per
month for 12 months starting on the one month anniversary of the vesting commencement date, subject to
Ms. Denholm’s continued service as Chair of the Board (except that if Ms. Denholm ceases to be a director on the
day before an annual meeting that is held earlier than the anniversary date of the vesting commencement date, vesting
will accelerate with respect to the shares that would have vested if she had continued service through such
anniversary date).
If, following a change in control of Tesla, the service of a non-employee director is terminated, all stock options granted to
the director pursuant to the compensation policy shall fully vest and become immediately exercisable.
Non-employee directors may also have their travel, lodging and related expenses associated with attending Board or Board
committee meetings reimbursed by Tesla.
Compensation Committee Interlocks and Insider Participation
Brad Buss, Robyn Denholm, Ira Ehrenpreis, Antonio Gracias, Linda Johnson Rice, and Kathleen Wilson-Thompson served
as members of the Compensation Committee during at least part of fiscal 2019. None of such persons is or was formerly an officer
or an employee of Tesla. See “Related Party Transactions” under Item 13 below for certain transactions involving Tesla in which
members of the Compensation Committee may potentially be deemed to have an indirect interest.
During 2019, no interlocking relationships existed between any member of Tesla’s Board or Compensation Committee and
any member of the board of directors or compensation committee of any other company.
 
24
 
ITEM 12.SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The following table summarizes the number of securities underlying outstanding options, stock awards, warrants and rights
granted to employees and directors, as well as the number of securities remaining available for future issuance, under Tesla’s equity
compensation awards as of December 31, 2019.
 
   (a)   (b)    (c)  
Plan category  Number of securities
to be issued upon
exercise of outstanding
options, warrants and
rights
(#)(1)   Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
($)(2)   Number of securities
remaining available for
future issuance under
equity compensation
plans (excluding
securities reflected in
column (a))
(#)  
Equity compensation plans approved
by
   security holders   34,689,313   279.20   18,663,018(3)
Equity compensation plans not
approved by
   security holders   111,796(4)  375.68   — 
Total   34,801,109   279.49   18,663,018 
 
(1) Consists of options to purchase shares of our common stock, including the 2018 CEO Performance Award, and restricted
stock unit awards representing the right to acquire shares of our common stock.
(2) The weighted average exercise price is calculated based solely on the outstanding stock options. It does not take into account
the shares issuable upon vesting of outstanding restricted stock unit awards, which have no exercise price.
(3) Consists of 11,441,597 shares remaining available for issuance under the Tesla, Inc. 2019 Equity Incentive Plan, and
7,221,421 shares remaining available for issuance under the Tesla, Inc, 2019 Employee Stock Purchase Plan.
(4) Consists of outstanding stock options and restricted stock unit awards that were assumed in connection with acquisitions. No
additional awards may be granted under the plans pursuant to which such awards were initially granted.
 
25
 
Ownership of Securities
The following table sets forth certain information regarding the beneficial ownership of Tesla’s common stock, as of
December 31, 2019, for the following:
 • each person (or group of affiliated persons) who is known by us to beneficially own 5% of the outstanding shares of
our common stock;
 • each of our non-employee directors;
 • each of our current executive officers named in the Summary Compensation Table in Item 11 above; and
 • all current directors and executive officers of Tesla as a group.
In computing the number of shares of common stock beneficially owned by a person and the percentage ownership of that
person, we deemed to be outstanding all shares of common stock subject to options or other convertible securities held by that
person or entity that are currently exercisable or exercisable within 60 days of December 31, 2019. We did not deem these shares
outstanding, however, for the purpose of computing the percentage ownership of any other person. Applicable percentage
ownership is based on 181,062,086 shares of Tesla’s common stock outstanding at December 31, 2019.
Unless otherwise indicated, all persons named below can be reached at Tesla, Inc., 3500 Deer Creek Road, Palo Alto,
California 94304.
 
Beneficial Owner Name  Shares
Beneficially
Owned    Percentage
of Shares
Beneficially
Owned  
5% Stockholders         
Elon Musk (1)   38,658,670    20.8%
Baillie Gif ford & Co. (2)   13,826,979    7.6%
Capital Ventures International (3)   12,134,541    6.7%
Capital World Investors (4)   10,739,283    5.9%
Named Executive Officers & Dir ectors         
Elon Musk (1)   38,658,670    20.8%
Zachary J. Kirkhorn (5)   45,925    * 
Jerome Guillen (6)   87,064    * 
Andrew Baglino (7)   31,010    * 
Robyn Denholm (8)   165,107    * 
Ira Ehrenpreis (9)   138,873    * 
Lawrence J. Ellison (10)   3,019,445    1.7%
Antonio Gracias (1 1)   426,475    * 
Stephen Jurvetson (12)   55,476    * 
Hiromichi Mizuno   —   — 
James Murdoch (13)   64,262    * 
Kimbal Musk (14)   161,825    * 
Kathleen Wilson-Thompson (15)   23,971    * 
All current executive of ficers and directors as a group (12 persons) (16)   42,878,103    23.0%
 
* Represents beneficial ownership of less than 1%.
(1) Includes (i) 34,085,560 shares held of record by the Elon Musk Revocable Trust dated July 22, 2003; and (ii) 4,573,110
shares issuable to Mr. Musk upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019. Includes
18,466,225 shares pledged as collateral to secure certain personal indebtedness.
26
 
(2) Includes shares held by Baillie Gifford & Co. and/or one or more of its investment adviser subsidiaries, which may include
Baillie Gifford Overseas Limited, on behalf of investment advisory clients, which may include investment companies
registered under the Investment Company Act, employee benefit plans, pension funds or other institutional clients. The
address for Baillie Gifford & Co. is Calton Square, 1 Greenside Row, Edinburgh EH1 3AN, Scotland, UK. The foregoing
information is based solely on Amendment No. 4 to Schedule 13G of Baillie Gifford & Co. filed on February 3, 2020, which
we do not know or have reason to believe is not complete or accurate and on which we are relying pursuant to applicable
SEC regulations.
(3) Includes 586,506 shares beneficially owned by Capital Ventures International, 3,823 shares beneficially owned by G1
Execution Services, LLC, 860,175 shares beneficially owned by Susquehanna Investment Group, and 10,684,037 shares
beneficially owned by Susquehanna Securities, LLC. Susquehanna Advisors Group, Inc. is the investment manager to
Capital Ventures International, and therefore may be deemed to beneficially own the shares owned by Capital Ventures
International. G1 Execution Services, LLC, Susquehanna Investment Group and Susquehanna Securities, LLC are affiliated
independent broker-dealers which, together with Capital Ventures International and Susquehanna Advisors Group, Inc., may
be deemed to be a group (the “Capital Ventures Group”). The address for Capital Ventures International is P.O. Box 897,
Windward 1, Regatta Office Park, West Bay Road, Grand Cayman, KY1-1103, Cayman Islands. The address of each of
Susquehanna Advisors Group, Inc., Susquehanna Investment Group and Susquehanna Securities, LLC is 401 E. City Ave,
Suite 220, Bala Cynwyd, PA 19004. The address of G1 Execution Services, LLC is 175 W. Jackson Blvd., Suite 1700,
Chicago, IL 60604. The foregoing information is based solely on Amendment No. 1 to Schedule 13G filed on February 10,
2020 jointly by the Capital Ventures Group, which we do not know or have reason to believe is not complete or accurate and
on which we are relying pursuant to applicable SEC regulations.
(4) Includes shares that may be deemed to be beneficially owned by Capital Research and Management Company and Capital
International Limited, which collectively provide investment management services under the name Capital World Investors.
The address for these entities is 333 South Hope Street, Los Angeles, CA 90071. The foregoing information is based solely
on Amendment No. 1 to Schedule 13G of Capital World Investors filed on February 14, 2020, which we do not know or
have reason to believe is not complete or accurate and on which we are relying pursuant to applicable SEC regulations.
(5) Includes 34,931 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019. Includes
7,100 shares pledged as collateral to secure certain personal indebtedness.
(6) Includes 77,828 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019.
(7) Includes 27,203 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019.
(8) Includes 164,107 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019.
(9) Includes 115,109 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019.
(10)Includes 19,445 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019.
(11)Includes (i) 268,857 shares owned by AJG Growth Fund LLC (“Growth Fund”), which are pledged as collateral to secure
certain personal indebtedness, and (ii) 157,109 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days of
December 31, 2019. Mr. Gracias is the fund manager for Growth Fund. The address for this entity is 875 North Michigan
Avenue, Suite 3214, Chicago, IL 60611.
(12)Includes (i) 52,100 shares held by the Steve Jurvetson TR UA dated January 29, 2019 Future Venture Living Trust, (ii) 43
shares held by Draper Fisher Jurvetson Fund X Partners, L.P., and (iii) 3,333 shares issuable upon exercise of options
exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019.
(13)Includes (i) 10,485 shares held by the JRM Family Trust and (ii) 53,777 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable
within 60 days after December 31, 2019.
(14)Includes 27,777 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019. Includes
134,048 shares pledged as collateral to secure certain personal indebtedness.
(15)Includes 23,611 shares issuable upon exercise of options exercisable within 60 days after December 31, 2019.
(16)Includes 5,277,340 shares issuable upon exercise of options held by our current executive officers and directors within 60
days after December 31, 2019.
27
 
ITEM 13.CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
Review of Related Party Transactions
In accordance with the charter for the Audit Committee of the Board, our Audit Committee reviews and approves in advance
any proposed related person transactions.
For purposes of these procedures, “related person” and “transaction” have the meanings contained in Item 404 of Regulation
S-K.
The individuals and entities that are considered “related persons” include:
 • Directors, nominees for director and executive officers of Tesla;
 • Any person known to be the beneficial owner of five percent or more of Tesla’s common stock (a “5% Stockholder”);
and
 • Any immediate family member, as defined in Item 404(a) of Regulation S-K, of a director, nominee for director,
executive officer or 5% Stockholder.
In accordance with our Related Person Transactions Policy and Procedures, the Audit Committee must review and approve
all transactions in which (i) Tesla or one of its subsidiaries is a participant, (ii) the amount involved exceeds $120,000 and (iii) a
related person has a direct or indirect material interest, other than transactions available to all Tesla employees generally.
In assessing a related party transaction brought before it for approval the Audit Committee considers, among other factors it
deems appropriate, whether the related party transaction is on terms no less favorable than terms generally available to an
unaffiliated third-party under the same or similar circumstances and the extent of the related person’s interest in the transaction. The
Audit Committee may then approve or disapprove the transaction in its discretion.
Any related person transaction will be disclosed in the applicable SEC filing as required by the rules of the SEC.
Related Party Transactions
SpaceX
Elon Musk is the Chief Executive Officer, Chief Technical Officer and a significant stockholder of SpaceX. Kimbal Musk,
Antonio Gracias, and Stephen Jurvetson, who are members of the Board, are also members of the board of directors of SpaceX. In
addition, certain members of the Board, and/or investment funds affiliated with them, have made minority investments in SpaceX.
SpaceX purchased certain battery components from Tesla at an aggregate purchase price of $1.0 million in 2019, and at an
aggregate purchase price of $1.2 million in 2020 through March. The pricing for such components was negotiated in good faith.
SpaceX has purchased certain non-battery vehicle parts from Tesla from time to time from a standard parts catalog that is
also available to other business partners. Such parts are offered to all buyers, including SpaceX, at uniform prices. SpaceX
purchased an aggregate $0.6 million of such parts in 2019 and an aggregate $0.6 million of such parts in 2020 through March.
In 2020, Tesla agreed to build a custom tool for SpaceX at its tool machining facility at an estimated cost of $0.7 million.
The pricing for such project, including labor hours, was negotiated in good faith, and such work will take place during previously
scheduled downtime at Tesla’s facility.
28
 
In 2019, SpaceX purchased a Tesla Energy system from Tesla for $0.3 million through standard sales processes. The price
was negotiated in good faith.
Since April 2016, SpaceX has invoiced Tesla for our use of an aircraft owned and operated by SpaceX at rates determined by
Tesla and SpaceX, subject to rules of the Federal Aviation Administration governing such arrangements. Tesla did not incur any
expenses under this arrangement in 2019 and has incurred $0.2 million in 2020 through March.
Other Transactions
In the ordinary course of business, we enter into offer letters with our executive officers. We have also entered into
indemnification agreements with each of our directors and officers. The indemnification agreements and our certificate of
incorporation and bylaws require us to indemnify our directors and officers to the fullest extent permitted by Delaware law. In
2019, Tesla entered into a one-year agreement with Elon Musk relating to the indemnification of directors and officers, as described
in “Director Independence” under this Item 13 below.
In 2019, our Board member James Murdoch purchased a Tesla Powerpack system from us at a total upfront cost of $0.6
million through standard sales processes. The price was negotiated in good faith.
In 2020, a company affiliated with our Board member Lawrence J. Ellison entered into an agreement to obtain preliminary
design services from us for an estimated $0.4 million, relating to the potential future implementation of a Tesla Energy system. The
services contract was negotiated and priced in good faith.
In February 2020, Messrs. Elon Musk and Ellison purchased from us 13,037 and 1,250 shares, respectively, of our common
stock in a public offering at the public offering price for an aggregate $11.0 million.
Director Independence
Our Board of Directors periodically assesses, with the recommendation of the Nominating and Corporate Governance
Committee, the independence of its non-employee members as defined in the listing standards of NASDAQ and applicable laws.
As part of such review in 2020, the Board undertook an analysis for each non-employee director and considered all relevant facts
and circumstances, including the director’s other commercial, accounting, legal, banking, consulting, charitable and familial
relationships. The Board determined that with respect to each of its current members other than Elon Musk, who is our Chief
Executive Officer, and Kimbal Musk, who is Elon Musk’s brother, there are no disqualifying factors with respect to director
independence enumerated in the listing standards of NASDAQ or any relationships that would interfere with the exercise of
independent judgment in carrying out the responsibilities of a director, and that each such member is an “independent director” as
defined in the listing standards of NASDAQ and applicable laws.
In particular, the Board reviewed the following considerations:
 • Ira Ehrenpreis, Antonio Gracias, Stephen Jurvetson, James Murdoch, Elon Musk, Kimbal Musk, and/or investment
funds affiliated with them, have made minority investments in certain companies or investment funds, (i) of which
other Tesla directors are founders, significant stockholders, directors, officers, or managers, and/or (ii) with which
Tesla has certain relationships set forth in “Related Party Transactions” under this Item 13 above. The Board
concluded that none of these investments are material so as to impede the exercise of independent judgment by any of
Messrs. Ehrenpreis, Gracias, Jurvetson or Mr. Murdoch, and that none of them has a direct or indirect interest in any
transaction between Tesla and another company set forth in “Related Party Transactions” under this Item 13 above.
 • Messrs. Gracias and Jurvetson are directors of SpaceX, (i) of which Elon Musk and Kimbal Musk are also directors,
and (ii) with which Tesla has certain relationships set forth in “Related Party Transactions—SpaceX” under this Item
13 above. The Board concluded that each of Messrs. Gracias and Jurvetson is an experienced investment professional
who has served on the boards of multiple companies without conflict or impairment of independent judgment.
 • Lawrence J. Ellison and Mr. Murdoch, and/or entities affiliated with them, have purchased certain Tesla products and
services from Tesla as set forth in “Related Party Transactions—Other Transactions”
29
 
 under this Item 13 above. The Board concluded that such purchases were negotiated and completed through ordinary
course sales processes in good faith on terms generally available to similar customers, and would not impair the
independent judgment of Messrs. Ellison or Murdoch.
 • Robyn Denholm and Mr. Ellison are or were formerly officers of certain companies from which Tesla has purchased
business services. The Board concluded that such purchases were for standard offerings in the ordinary course of
business pursuant to good faith contracting processes in which neither Ms. Denholm nor Mr. Ellison were involved or
had any material interest.
 • Tesla determined not to renew its directors and officers liability insurance policy for the 2019-2020 year due to
disproportionately high premiums quoted by insurance companies. Instead, Elon Musk agreed with Tesla to
personally provide coverage substantially equivalent to such a policy for a one-year period, and the other members of
the Board are third-party beneficiaries thereof. The Board concluded that because such arrangement is governed by a
binding agreement with Tesla as to which Mr. Musk does not have unilateral discretion to perform, and is intended to
replace an ordinary course insurance policy, it would not impair the independent judgment of the other members of
the Board.
In addition, prior to their departures from the Board in June 2019, the Board had determined that Brad Buss and Linda
Johnson Rice were independent directors as defined in the listing standards of NASDAQ and applicable laws.
ITEM 14.PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
Principal Accounting Fees and Services
The following table presents fees billed for professional audit services and other services rendered to Tesla by
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2019. The dollar amounts in the table and accompanying
footnotes are in thousands.
             2018   2019  
Audit Fees (1)  $ 12,088   $ 12,527 
Audit-Related Fees (2)   160    — 
Tax Fees (3)   514    999 
All Other Fees (4)   3    9 
         
Total  $ 12,766   $ 13,535 
 
(1) Audit Fees consist of fees billed for professional services rendered for the audit of Tesla’s consolidated financial statements
included in Tesla’s Annual Report on Form 10-K and for the review of the financial statements included in Tesla’s Quarterly
Reports on Form 10-Q, as well as services that generally only Tesla’s independent registered public accounting firm can
reasonably provide, including statutory audits and services rendered in connection with SEC filings. The Audit Fees incurred
in 2019 also include fees of $435 relating to services performed in connection with Tesla’s securities offerings, in each case
including comfort letters, consents and review of documents filed with the SEC and other offering documents.
(2) Audit-Related Fees in 2018 consisted of fees billed for professional services for assistance with interpretation of accounting
standards.
(3) Tax Fees in 2018 and 2019 consisted of fees related to consultation and assistance with foreign taxation matters.
(4) Other Fees in 2018 and 2019 primarily consisted of fees for use of accounting software.
Pre-Approval of Audit and Non-Audit Services
Tesla’s Audit Committee has adopted a policy for pre-approving audit and non-audit services and associated fees of Tesla’s
independent registered public accounting firm. Under this policy, the Audit Committee must pre- approve all services and
associated fees provided to Tesla by its independent registered public accounting firm, with certain de minimis exceptions described
in the policy.
All PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP services and fees in fiscal 2018 and 2019 were pre-approved by the Audit Committee.
 
30
 
PART IV
ITEM 15.EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
 
1. Financial statements (see Index to Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of the Original Form 10-K).
 
2. All financial statement schedules have been omitted since the required information was not applicable or was not present in
amounts sufficient to require submission of the schedules, or because the information required is included in the
consolidated financial statements or the accompanying notes.
 
3. The exhibits listed in the following Index to Exhibits are filed or incorporated by reference as part of this report.
 
 
31
 
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
             
    3.1
  Amended and Restated Certificate of
Incorporation of the Registrant.   10-K   001-34756   3.1   March 1, 2017
   
             
    3.2
 Certificate of Amendment to the
Amended and Restated Certificate of
Incorporation of the Registrant.  10-K  001-34756  3.2  March 1, 2017
  
             
    3.3
  Amended and Restated Bylaws of the
Registrant.   8-K   001-34756   3.2   February 1, 2017
   
             
    4.1
  Specimen common stock certificate
of the Registrant.   10-K   001-34756   4.1   March 1, 2017
   
             
    4.2
  Fifth Amended and Restated
Investors’ Rights Agreement, dated as
of August 31, 2009, between
Registrant and certain holders of the
Registrant’s capital stock named
therein.   S-1   333-164593   4.2   January 29, 2010
   
             
    4.3
  Amendment to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investors’ Rights
Agreement, dated as of May 20,
2010, between Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s capital
stock named therein.   S-1/A   333-164593   4.2A   May 27, 2010
   
             
    4.4
  Amendment to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investors’ Rights Agreement
between Registrant, Toyota Motor
Corporation and certain holders of the
Registrant’s capital stock named
therein.   S-1/A   333-164593   4.2B   May 27, 2010
   
             
    4.5
  Amendment to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investor’s Rights
Agreement, dated as of June 14,
2010, between Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s capital
stock named therein.   S-1/A   333-164593   4.2C   June 15, 2010
   
             
    4.6
  Amendment to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investor’s Rights
Agreement, dated as of November 2,
2010, between Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s capital
stock named therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   November 4, 2010
   
             
32
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.7
  Waiver to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investor’s Rights
Agreement, dated as of May 22, 2011,
between Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s capital
stock named therein.   S-1/A   333-174466   4.2E   June 2, 2011
   
             
    4.8
  Amendment to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investor’s Rights
Agreement, dated as of May 30, 2011,
between Registrant and certain
holders of the Registrant’s capital
stock named therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   June 1, 2011
   
             
    4.9
  Sixth Amendment to Fifth Amended
and Restated Investors’ Rights
Agreement, dated as of May 15, 2013
among the Registrant, the Elon Musk
Revocable Trust dated July 22, 2003
and certain other holders of the
capital stock of the Registrant named
therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   May 20, 2013
   
             
    4.10
  Waiver to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investor’s Rights
Agreement, dated as of May 14,
2013, between the Registrant and
certain holders of the capital stock of
the Registrant named therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.2   May 20, 2013
   
             
    4.11
  Waiver to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investor’s Rights
Agreement, dated as of August 13,
2015, between the Registrant and
certain holders of the capital stock of
the Registrant named therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   August 19, 2015
   
             
    4.12
  Waiver to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investors’ Rights
Agreement, dated as of May 18,
2016, between the Registrant and
certain holders of the capital stock of
the Registrant named therein.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   May 24, 2016
   
             
    4.13
 Waiver to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investors’ Rights
Agreement, dated as of March 15,
2017, between the Registrant and
certain holders of the capital stock of
the Registrant named therein.  8-K   001-34756   4.1   March 17, 2017
   
             
33
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.14
 Waiver to Fifth Amended and
Restated Investors’ Rights
Agreement, dated as of May 1, 2019,
between the Registrant and certain
holders of the capital stock of the
Registrant named therein.  8-K   001-34756   4.1   May 3, 2019
   
    4.15
  Indenture, dated as of May 22, 2013,
by and between the Registrant and
U.S. Bank National Association.   8-K   001-34756   4.1   May 22, 2013
   
             
    4.16
 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated
as of March 5, 2014, by and between
the Registrant and U.S. Bank
National Association.  8-K  001-34756  4.4  March 5, 2014
  
             
    4.17
 Form of 1.25% Convertible Senior
Note Due March 1, 2021 (included in
Exhibit 4.19).  8-K  001-34756  4.4  March 5, 2014
  
             
    4.18
 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated
as of March 22, 2017, by and between
the Registrant and U.S. Bank
National Association. 8-K  001-34756  4.2  March 22, 2017
  
             
    4.19
 Form of 2.375% Convertible Senior
Note Due March 15, 2022 (included
in Exhibit 4.21). 8-K  001-34756  4.2  March 22, 2017
  
             
    4.20
 Indenture, dated as of August 18,
2017, by and among the Registrant,
SolarCity, and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee. 8-K  001-34756  4.1  August 23, 2017
  
             
    4.21
 Form of 5.30% Senior Note due
August 15, 2025. 8-K  001-34756  4.2  August 23, 2017
  
             
    4.22
 Indenture, dated as of September 30,
2014, between SolarCity and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.1  October 6, 2014
  
             
    4.23
 First Supplemental Indenture, dated
as of November 21, 2016, between
SolarCity and Wells Fargo Bank,
National Association, as trustee to the
Indenture, dated as of September 30,
2014, between SolarCity and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as
trustee.  8-K  001-34756  4.2  November 21, 2016
  
             
    4.24
 Indenture, dated as of December 7,
2015, between SolarCity and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.1  December 7, 2015
  
             
34
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.25
 First Supplemental Indenture, dated
as of November 21, 2016, between
SolarCity and Wells Fargo Bank,
National Association, as trustee to the
Indenture, dated as of December 7,
2015, between SolarCity and Wells
Fargo Bank, National Association, as
trustee.  8-K  001-34756  4.3  November 21, 2016
  
             
    4.26  Indenture, dated as of October 15,
2014, between SolarCity and U.S.
Bank National Association, as trustee. S-3ASR(1) 333-199321  4.1  October 15, 2014   
             
    4.27
 Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated
as of May 7, 2019, by and between
Registrant and U.S. Bank National
Association, related to 2.00%
Convertible Senior Notes due May
15, 2024.  8-K  001-34756  4.2  May 8, 2019
  
             
    4.28
 Form of 2.00% Convertible Senior
Notes due May 15, 2024 (included in
Exhibit 4.27).  8-K  001-34756  4.3  May 8, 2019
  
             
    4.29  Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated
as of October 15, 2014, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2014/4-7. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  October 15, 2014   
             
    4.30  Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated
as of January 29, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/4-7. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  January 29, 2015   
             
    4.31  Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated
as of March 9, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.00% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/5-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.2  March 9, 2015   
             
    4.32  Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated
as of March 9, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.00% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/6-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  March 9, 2015   
35
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.33  Eleventh Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of March 9, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.75% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/7-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  March 9, 2015   
             
    4.34  Fourteenth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of March 19, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C3-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  March 19, 2015
  
             
    4.35  Fifteenth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of March 19, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C4-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  March 19, 2015
  
             
    4.36  Sixteenth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of March 19, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C5-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  March 19, 2015
  
             
    4.37  Nineteenth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of March 26, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C8-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  March 26, 2015
  
             
    4.38  Twentieth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of March 26, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C9-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  March 26, 2015
  
             
    4.39  Twenty-First Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of March 26, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C10-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  March 26, 2015
  
             
    4.40  Twenty-Fifth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April 2, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 3.60%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C13-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  April 2, 2015
  
             
36
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.41  Twenty-Sixth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April 2, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 4.70%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C14-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  April 2, 2015
  
             
    4.42  Twenty-Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April 9, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 3.60%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C18-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  April 9, 2015
  
             
    4.43  Thirtieth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 9, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C19-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  April 9, 2015
  
             
    4.44  Thirty-First Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 9, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C20-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  April 9, 2015
  
             
    4.45  Thirty-Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April 14, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 3.60%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C23-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  April 14, 2015
  
             
    4.46  Thirty-Fifth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 14, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C24-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  April 14, 2015
  
             
    4.47  Thirty-Sixth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 14, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C25-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  April 14, 2015
  
             
    4.48  Thirty-Eighth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April 21, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 4.70%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C27-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  April 21, 2015
  
             
37
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.49  Thirty-Ninth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 21, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C28-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  April 21, 2015
  
             
    4.50  Forty-Second Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of April 27, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 3.60%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C31-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  April 27, 2015
  
             
    4.51  Forty-Third Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 27, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C32-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  April 27, 2015
  
             
    4.52  Forty-Fourth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of April 27, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C33-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  April 27, 2015
  
             
    4.53  Forty-Seventh Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May 1, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 4.00%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/11-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  May 1, 2015
  
             
    4.54  Forty-Eighth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 1, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/12-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  May 1, 2015
  
             
    4.55  Forty-Ninth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 1, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.75% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/13-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  May 1, 2015
  
             
    4.56  Fifty-First Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 11, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C35-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  May 11, 2015
  
             
38
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.57  Fifty-Second Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 11, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C36-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  May 11, 2015
  
             
    4.58  Fifty-Third Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 11, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C37-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  May 11, 2015
  
             
    4.59  Fifty-Sixth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 18, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C39-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  May 18, 2015
  
             
    4.60  Fifty-Seventh Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May 18, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 4.70%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C40-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  May 18, 2015
  
             
    4.61  Fifty-Eighth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 18, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C41-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  May 18, 2015
  
             
    4.62  Sixtieth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 26, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C43-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  May 26, 2015
  
             
    4.63  Sixty-First Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of May 26, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C44-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  May 26, 2015
  
             
    4.64  Sixty-Second Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of May 26, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 5.45%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C45-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  May 26, 2015
  
             
39
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.65  Sixty-Fifth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of June 8, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C47-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  June 10, 2015
  
             
    4.66  Sixty-Seventh Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of June 8, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 5.45%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C49-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  June 10, 2015
  
             
    4.67  Seventieth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of June 16, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C52-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  June 16, 2015
  
             
    4.68  Seventy-First Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of June 16, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 5.45%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C53-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  June 16, 2015
  
             
    4.69  Seventy-Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of June 22, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 4.70%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C56-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  June 23, 2015
  
             
    4.70  Seventy-Fifth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of June 22, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 5.45%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C57-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  June 23, 2015
  
             
    4.71  Seventy-Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of June 29, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 3.60%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C60-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  June 29, 2015
  
             
    4.72  Eightieth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of June 29, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C61-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  June 29, 2015
  
             
40
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.73  Eighty-First Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of June 29, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C62-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  June 29, 2015
  
             
    4.74  Eighty-Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of July 14, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 3.60%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C65-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  July 14, 2015
  
             
    4.75  Eighty-Sixth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of July 14, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C67-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  July 14, 2015
  
             
    4.76  Eighty-Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of July 20, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 3.60%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C70-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  July 21, 2015
  
             
    4.77  Ninetieth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of July 20, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C71-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  July 21, 2015
  
             
    4.78  Ninety-First Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of July 20, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/C72-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  July 21, 2015
  
             
    4.79  Ninety-Fourth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of July 31, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 4.00%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/19-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  July 31, 2015
  
             
    4.80  Ninety-Fifth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of July 31, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.00% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/20-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  July 31, 2015
  
             
41
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.81  Ninety-Sixth Supplemental Indenture,
dated as of July 31, 2015, by and
between SolarCity and the Trustee,
related to SolarCity’s 5.75% Solar
Bonds, Series 2015/21-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  July 31, 2015
  
             
    4.82  Ninety-Ninth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of August 3, 2015,
by and between SolarCity and the
Trustee, related to SolarCity’s 3.60%
Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C75-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  August 3, 2015
  
             
    4.83  One Hundred-and-Fifth Supplemental
Indenture, dated as of August 10,
2015, by and between SolarCity and
the Trustee, related to SolarCity’s
4.70% Solar Bonds, Series 2015/C81-
10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  August 10, 2015
  
             
    4.84  One Hundred-and-Ninth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 17, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C85-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  August 17, 2015
  
             
    4.85  One Hundred-and-Eleventh
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 17, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C87-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  August 17, 2015
  
             
    4.86  One Hundred-and-Fourteenth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 24, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C90-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  August 24, 2015
  
             
    4.87  One Hundred-and-Sixteenth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 24, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C92-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  August 24, 2015
  
             
42
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.88  One Hundred-and-Nineteenth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 31, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C95-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  August 31, 2015
  
             
    4.89  One Hundred-and-Twenty-First
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
August 31, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C97-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  August 31, 2015
  
             
    4.90  One Hundred-and-Twenty-Seventh
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 14, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C100-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  September 15, 2015
  
             
    4.91  One Hundred-and-Twenty-Eighth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 14, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C101-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  September 15, 2015
  
             
    4.92  One Hundred-and-Twenty-Ninth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 14, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C102-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  September 15, 2015
  
             
    4.93  One Hundred-and-Thirty-Second
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 28, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C105-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  September 29, 2015
  
             
    4.94  One Hundred-and-Thirty-Third
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 28, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C106-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  September 29, 2015
  
             
43
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.95  One Hundred-and-Thirty-Fourth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
September 28, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C107-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  September 29, 2015
  
             
    4.96  One Hundred-and-Thirty-Seventh
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
October 13, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C110-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  October 13, 2015
  
             
    4.97  One Hundred-and-Thirty-Eighth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
October 13, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C111-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  October 13, 2015
  
             
    4.98  One Hundred-and-Forty-Second
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
October 30, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.00% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/24-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  October 30, 2015
  
             
    4.99  One Hundred-and-Forty-Third
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
October 30, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.00% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/25-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  October 30, 2015
  
             
    4.100 One Hundred-and-Forty-Fourth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
October 30, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.75% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/26-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  October 30, 2015
  
             
    4.101 One Hundred-and-Forty-Seventh
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 4, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C115-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  November 4, 2015
  
             
44
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.102 One Hundred-and-Forty-Eighth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 4, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C116-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  November 4, 2015
  
             
    4.103 One Hundred-and-Fifty-Third
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 16, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C121-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  November 17, 2015
  
             
    4.104 One Hundred-and-Fifty-Fourth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 16, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C122-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  November 17, 2015
  
             
    4.105 One Hundred-and-Fifty-Eighth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 30, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C126-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  November 30, 2015
  
             
    4.106 One Hundred-and-Fifty-Ninth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
November 30, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C127-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  November 30, 2015
  
             
    4.107 One Hundred-and-Sixty-Second
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 14, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C130-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  December 14, 2015
  
             
    4.058 One Hundred-and-Sixty-Third
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 14, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C131-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  December 14, 2015
  
             
45
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.109 One Hundred-and-Sixty-Fourth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 14, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C132-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  December 14, 2015
  
             
    4.110 One Hundred-and-Sixty-Seventh
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 28, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 3.60% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C135-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  December 28, 2015
  
             
    4.111 One Hundred-and-Sixty-Eighth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 28, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.70% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C136-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  December 28, 2015
  
             
    4.112 One Hundred-and-Sixty-Ninth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
December 28, 2015, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.45% Solar Bonds,
Series 2015/C137-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  December 28, 2015
  
             
    4.113 One Hundred-and-Seventy-Second
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 29, 2016, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 4.00% Solar Bonds,
Series 2016/3-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  January 29, 2016
  
             
    4.114 One Hundred-and-Seventy-Third
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 29, 2016, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.00% Solar Bonds,
Series 2016/4-10. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.5  January 29, 2016
  
             
    4.115 One Hundred-and-Seventy-Fourth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
January 29, 2016, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.75% Solar Bonds,
Series 2016/5-15. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.6  January 29, 2016
  
             
46
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
    4.116 One Hundred-and-Seventy-Seventh
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
February 26, 2016, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.25% Solar Bonds,
Series 2016/8-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.4  February 26, 2016
  
             
    4.117 One Hundred-and-Seventy-Ninth
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
March 21, 2016, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.25% Solar Bonds,
Series 2016/10-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  March 21, 2016
  
             
    4.118 One Hundred-and-Eighty-First
Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
June 10, 2016, by and between
SolarCity and the Trustee, related to
SolarCity’s 5.25% Solar Bonds,
Series 2016/12-5. 8-K(1)  001-35758  4.3  June 10, 2016
  
             
    4.119 Description of Registrant’s Securities 10-K  001-34756  4.119  February 13, 2020   
             
  10.1**
  Form of Indemnification Agreement
between the Registrant and its
directors and officers.   S-1/A   333-164593   10.1   June 15, 2010
   
             
  10.2**  2003 Equity Incentive Plan.   S-1/A   333-164593   10.2   May 27, 2010    
             
  10.3**
  Form of Stock Option Agreement
under 2003 Equity Incentive Plan.   S-1   333-164593   10.3   January 29, 2010
   
             
  10.4**
  Amended and Restated 2010 Equity
Incentive Plan.   10-K   001-34756   10.4  February 23, 2018
  
             
  10.5**
  Form of Stock Option Agreement
under 2010 Equity Incentive Plan.   10-K   001-34756   10.6   March 1, 2017
   
             
  10.6**
  Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award
Agreement under 2010 Equity
Incentive Plan.   10-K   001-34756   10.7   March 1, 2017
   
             
  10.7**
  Amended and Restated 2010
Employee Stock Purchase Plan,
effective as of February 1, 2017.  10-K   001-34756   10.8   March 1, 2017
   
             
  10.8**  2019 Equity Incentive Plan.   S-8   333-232079   4.2  June 12, 2019   
             
  10.9**
  Form of Stock Option Agreement
under 2019 Equity Incentive Plan.   S-8   333-232079   4.3   June 12, 2019
   
             
  10.10**
  Form of Restricted Stock Unit Award
Agreement under 2019 Equity
Incentive Plan.   S-8   333-232079   4.4   June 12, 2019
   
47
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
             
  10.11**
  Employee Stock Purchase Plan,
effective as of June 12, 2019.   S-8   333-232079   4.5   June 12, 2019
   
             
  10.12**
 2007 SolarCity Stock Plan and form
of agreements used thereunder. S-1(1) 333-184317 10.2 October 5, 2012
  
             
  10.13**
 2012 SolarCity Equity Incentive Plan
and form of agreements used
thereunder.  S-1(1)  333-184317  10.3  October 5, 2012
  
             
  10.14**
 2010 Zep Solar, Inc. Equity Incentive
Plan and form of agreements used
thereunder.  S-8(1)  333-192996  4.5  December 20, 2013
  
             
  10.15**
  Offer Letter between the Registrant
and Elon Musk dated October 13,
2008.   S-1   333-164593   10.9   January 29, 2010
   
             
  10.16**
 Performance Stock Option Agreement
between the Registrant and Elon
Musk dated January 21, 2018.  DEF 14A  001-34756  Appendix
A February 8, 2018
  
             
  10.17
 Indemnification Agreement, dated as
of February 27, 2014, by and between
the Registrant and J.P. Morgan
Securities LLC.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  March 5, 2014
  
             
  10.18
 Form of Call Option Confirmation
relating to 0.25% Convertible Senior
Notes Due March 1, 2019.  8-K  001-34756  10.2  March 5, 2014
  
             
  10.19
 Form of Call Option Confirmation
relating to 1.25% Convertible Senior
Notes Due March 1, 2021.  8-K  001-34756  10.3  March 5, 2014
  
             
  10.20
 Form of Warrant Confirmation
relating to 0.25% Convertible Senior
Notes Due March 1, 2019.  8-K  001-34756  10.4  March 5, 2014
  
             
  10.21
 Form of Warrant Confirmation
relating to 1.25% Convertible Senior
Notes Due March 1, 2021.  8-K  001-34756  10.5  March 5, 2014
  
             
  10.22
 Form of Call Option Confirmation
relating to 2.375% Convertible Notes
due March 15, 2022.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  March 22, 2017
  
             
  10.23
 Form of Warrant Confirmation
relating to 2.375% Convertible Notes
due March 15, 2022.  8-K  001-34756  10.2  March 22, 2017
  
             
48
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.24
 Form of Call Option Confirmation
relating to 2.00% Convertible Senior
Notes due May 15, 2024.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  May 3, 2019
  
             
  10.25
 Form of Warrant Confirmation
relating to 2.00% Convertible Senior
Notes due May 15, 2024.  8-K  001-34756  10.2  May 3, 2019
  
  10.26†
  Supply Agreement between
Panasonic Corporation and the
Registrant dated October 5, 2011.   10-K   -001-34756   10.50   February 27, 2012
   
             
  10.27†
  Amendment No. 1 to Supply
Agreement between Panasonic
Corporation and the Registrant dated
October 29, 2013.   10-K   001-34756   10.35A   February 26, 2014
   
             
  10.28
 Agreement between Panasonic
Corporation and the Registrant dated
July 31, 2014.  10-Q  001-34756  10.1  November 7, 2014
  
             
  10.29†
 General Terms and Conditions
between Panasonic Corporation and
the Registrant dated October 1, 2014. 8-K  001-34756  10.2  October 11, 2016
  
             
  10.30
 Letter Agreement, dated as of
February 24, 2015, regarding addition
of co-party to General Terms and
Conditions, Production Pricing
Agreement and Investment Letter
Agreement between Panasonic
Corporation and the Registrant.  10-K  001-34756  10.25A  February 24, 2016
  
 
             
  10.31†
 Amendment to Gigafactory General
Terms, dated March 1, 2016, by and
among the Registrant, Panasonic
Corporation and Panasonic Energy
Corporation of North America.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  October 11, 2016
  
             
  10.32†
 Production Pricing Agreement
between Panasonic Corporation and
the Registrant dated October 1, 2014. 10-Q  001-34756  10.3  November 7, 2014
  
             
  10.33†
 Investment Letter Agreement between
Panasonic Corporation and the
Registrant dated October 1, 2014.  10-Q  001-34756  10.4  November 7, 2014
  
             
49
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.34
 Amendment to Gigafactory
Documents, dated April 5, 2016, by
and among the Registrant, Panasonic
Corporation, Panasonic Corporation
of North America and Panasonic
Energy Corporation of North
America.  10-Q  001-34756  10.2  May 10, 2016
  
             
  10.35††
 2019 Pricing Agreement (2170 Cells)
with respect to 2014 Gigafactory
Agreements, executed September 20,
2019, by and among the Registrant,
Tesla Motors Netherlands B.V.,
Panasonic Corporation and Panasonic
Corporation of North America, on
behalf of its division Panasonic
Energy Corporation of North
America.  10-Q  001-34756  10.5  October 29, 2019
  
             
  10.36††
 2019 Pricing Agreement (Japan Cells)
with respect to 2011 Supply
Agreement, executed September 20,
2019, by and among the Registrant,
Tesla Motors Netherlands B.V.,
Panasonic Corporation and SANYO
Electric Co., Ltd.  10-Q  001-34756  10.6  October 29, 2019
  
             
  10.37††
 Amended and Restated Factory
Lease, executed as of March 26, 10`9,
by and between Tesla, Inc. and
Panasonic Energy North America, a
division of Panasonic Corporation of
North America, as tenant.  10-Q  001-34756  10.3  July 29, 2019
  
             
  10.38††
 Lease Amendment, executed
September 20, 2019, by and among
the Registrant, Panasonic Corporation
of North America, on behalf of its
division Panasonic Energy of North
America, with respect to the
Amended and Restated Factory
Lease, executed as of March 26,
2019.  10-Q  001-34756  10.7  October 29, 2019
  
             
50
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.39
 ABL Credit Agreement, dated as of
June 10, 2015, by and among the
Registrant, Tesla Motors Netherlands
B.V., certain of the Registrant’s and
Tesla Motors Netherlands B.V.’s
direct or indirect subsidiaries from
time to time party thereto, as
borrowers, Wells Fargo Bank,
National Association, as
documentation agent, JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A., Goldman Sachs
Bank USA, Morgan Stanley Senior
Funding Inc. and Bank of America,
N.A., as syndication agents, the
lenders from time to time party
thereto, and Deutsche Bank AG New
York Branch, as administrative agent
and collateral agent.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  June 12, 2015
  
             
  10.40
 First Amendment, dated as of
November 3, 2015, to ABL Credit
Agreement, dated as of June 10,
2015, by and among the Registrant,
Tesla Motors Netherlands B.V.,
certain of the Registrant’s and Tesla
Motors Netherlands B.V.’s direct or
indirect subsidiaries from time to time
party thereto, as borrowers, and the
documentation agent, syndication
agents, administrative agent,
collateral agent and lenders from time
to time party thereto.  10-Q  001-34756  10.1  November 5, 2015
  
             
  10.41
 Second Amendment, dated as of
December 31, 2015, to ABL Credit
Agreement, dated as of June 10,
2015, by and among the Registrant,
Tesla Motors Netherlands B.V.,
certain of the Registrant’s and Tesla
Motors Netherlands B.V.’s direct or
indirect subsidiaries from time to time
party thereto, as borrowers, and the
documentation agent, syndication
agents, administrative agent,
collateral agent and lenders from time
to time party thereto.  10-K  001-34756  10.28B  February 24, 2016
  
             
51
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.42
 Third Amendment, dated as of
February 9, 2016, to ABL Credit
Agreement, dated as of June 10,
2015, by and among the Registrant,
Tesla Motors Netherlands B.V.,
certain of the Registrant’s and Tesla
Motors Netherlands B.V.’s direct or
indirect subsidiaries from time to time
party thereto, as borrowers, and the
documentation agent, syndication
agents, administrative agent,
collateral agent and lenders from time
to time party thereto.  10-K  001-34756  10.28C  February 24, 2016
  
             
  10.43
 Fourth Amendment to Credit
Agreement, dated as of July 31, 2016,
by and among the Registrant, Tesla
Motors Netherlands B.V., the lenders
party thereto and Deutsche Bank AG
New York Branch, as administrative
agent and collateral agent.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  August 1, 2016
  
             
  10.44
 Fifth Amendment to Credit
Agreement, dated as of December 15,
2016, among the Registrant, Tesla
Motors Netherlands B.V., the lenders
party thereto and Deutsche Bank AG,
New York Branch, as administrative
agent and collateral agent.  8-K  001-34756  10.1  December 20, 2016
  
             
  10.45
 Sixth Amendment to Credit
Agreement, dated as of June 19,
2017, among the Registrant, Tesla
Motors Netherlands B.V., the lenders
party thereto and Deutsche Bank AG,
New York Branch, as administrative
agent and collateral agent.  10-Q  001-34756  10.1  August 4, 2017
  
             
  10.46
 Seventh Amendment to the ABL
Credit Agreement, dated as of August
11, 2017, by and among the
Registrant, Tesla Motors Netherlands
B.V., Deutsche Bank AG New York
Branch, as administrative agent and
collateral agent, and the other agents
party thereto.  8-K  001-34756  10.2  August 23, 2017
  
             
52
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.47
 
 Eighth Amendment to the ABL Credit
Agreement, dated as of March 12,
2018, by and among the Registrant,
Tesla Motors Netherlands B.V.,
Deutsche Bank AG New York
Branch, as administrative agent and
collateral agent, and the other agents
party thereto.  10-Q  001-34756  10.2  May 7, 2018
  
             
  10.48
 
 Ninth Amendment to the ABL Credit
Agreement, dated as of May 3, 2018,
by and among the Registrant, Tesla
Motors Netherlands B.V., Deutsche
Bank AG New York Branch, as
administrative agent and collateral
agent, and the other agents party
thereto.  10-Q  001-34756  10.3  May 7, 2018
  
             
  10.49
 Tenth Amendment to the ABL Credit
Agreement, dated as of December 10,
2018, by and among the Registrant,
Tesla Motors Netherlands B.V.,
Deutsche Bank AG New York
Branch, as administrative agent and
collateral agent, and the other agents
party thereto.  10-K    001-34756   10.41    February 19, 2019  
   
             
  10.50
 Amendment and Restatement in
respect of ABL Credit Agreement,
dated as of March 6, 2019, by and
among certain of the Registrant’s and
Tesla Motors Netherlands B.V.’s
direct or indirect subsidiaries from
time to time party thereto, as
borrowers, Wells Fargo Bank,
National Association, as
documentation agent, JPMorgan
Chase Bank, N.A., Goldman Sachs
Bank USA, Morgan Stanley Senior
Funding Inc. and Bank of America,
N.A., as syndication agents, the
lenders from time to time party
thereto, and Deutsche Bank AG New
York Branch, as administrative agent
and collateral agent.  S-4/A 333-229749   10.68   April 3, 2019  
   
             
53
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.51
 Eleventh Amendment to Credit
Agreement, dated as of February 1,
2019, in respect of the ABL Credit
Agreement, dated as of June 10,
2015, among Tesla, Inc., Tesla Motors
Netherlands B.V., the lenders from
time to time party thereto, Deutsche
Bank AG New York Branch, as
administrative agent and collateral
agent and as Collateral Agent, and the
other agent parties thereto.  10-Q   001-34756   10.1   April 29, 2019  
   
             
  10.52†
 
 Agreement for Tax Abatement and
Incentives, dated as of May 7, 2015,
by and between Tesla Motors, Inc.
and the State of Nevada, acting by
and through the Nevada Governor’s
Office of Economic Development. 10-Q  001-34756  10.1  August 7, 2015
  
             
  10.53†
 Amended and Restated Loan and
Security Agreement, dated as of
August 17, 2017, by and among Tesla
2014 Warehouse SPV LLC, Tesla
Finance LLC, the Lenders and Group
Agents from time to time party
thereto, and Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as Administrative
Agent.  10-Q  001-34756  10.3  November 3, 2017
  
             
  10.54†
 Amendment No. 1 to Amended and
Restated Loan and Security
Agreement, dated as of October 18,
2017, by and among Tesla 2014
Warehouse SPV LLC, Tesla Finance
LLC, the Lenders and Group Agents
from time to time party thereto,
Deutsche Bank AG, New York
Branch, as Administrative Agent, and
Deutsche Bank Trust Company
Americas, as Paying Agent.  10-K   001-34756   10.44  February 23, 2018
   
             
54
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.55
 Amendment No. 2 to Amended and
Restated Loan and Security
Agreement, dated as of March 23,
2018, by and among Tesla 2014
Warehouse SPV LLC, Tesla Finance
LLC, the Lenders and Group Agents
from time to time party thereto,
Deutsche Bank AG, New York
Branch, as Administrative Agent, and
Deutsche Bank Trust Company
Americas, as Paying Agent. 10-Q 001-34756 10.4 May 7, 2018
  
             
  10.56
 Amendment No. 3 to Amended and
Restated Loan and Security
Agreement, dated as of May 4, 2018,
by and among Tesla 2014 Warehouse
SPV LLC, Tesla Finance LLC, the
Lenders and Group Agents from time
to time party thereto, Deutsche Bank
AG, New York Branch as
Administrative Agent, and Deutsche
Bank Trust Company Americas, as
Paying Agent.  10-Q  001-34756  10.1  November 2, 2018
  
             
  10.57†
 Amendment No. 4 to Amended and
Restated Loan and Security
Agreement, dated as of August 16,
2018, by and among Tesla 2014
Warehouse SPV LLC, Tesla Finance
LLC, the Lenders and Group Agents
from time to time party thereto,
Deutsche Bank AG, New York
Branch as Administrative Agent and
Deutsche Bank Trust Company
Americas, as Paying Agent.  10-Q  001-34756  10.3  November 2, 2018
  
             
  10.58†
 Amendment No. 5 to Amended and
Restated Loan and Security
Agreement, executed on December
28, 2018, by and among Tesla 2014
Warehouse SPV LLC, Tesla Finance
LLC, the Lenders and Group Agents
from time to time party thereto,
Deutsche Bank AG, New York
Branch as Administrative Agent and
Deutsche Bank Trust Company
Americas, as Paying Agent.  10-K    001-34756   10.48    February 19, 2019  
   
             
55
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.59††
 Amendment No. 6 to Amended and
Restated Loan and Security
Agreement, dated as of August 16,
2019, by and among Tesla 2014
Warehouse SPV LLC, Deutsche Bank
Trust Company Americas, New York
Branch, as Administrative Agent, and
the Lenders and Group Agents from
time to time party thereto.  10-Q    001-34756   10.1    October 29, 2019  
   
             
  10.60†
 Loan and Security Agreement, dated
as of August 17, 2017, by and among
LML Warehouse SPV, LLC, Tesla
Finance LLC, the Lenders and Group
Agents from time to time party
thereto, and Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as Administrative
Agent.  10-Q  001-34756  10.4  November 3, 2017
  
             
  10.61†
 Amendment No. 1 to Loan and
Security Agreement, dated as of
October 18, 2017, by and among
LML Warehouse SPV, LLC, Tesla
Finance LLC, the Lenders and Group
Agents from time to time party
thereto, Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as Administrative
Agent, and Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americas, as Paying Agent. 10-K   001-34756   10.46  February 23, 2018
   
             
  10.62
 Amendment No. 2 to Loan and
Security Agreement, dated as of
March 23, 2018, by and among LML
Warehouse SPV, LLC, Tesla Finance
LLC, the Lenders and Group Agents
from time to time party thereto,
Deutsche Bank AG, New York
Branch, as Administrative Agent, and
Deutsche Bank Trust Company
Americas, as Paying Agent.  10-Q  001-34756  10.5  May 7, 2018
  
             
  10.63
 Amendment No. 3 to Loan and
Security Agreement, dated as of May
4, 2018, by and among LML
Warehouse SPV, LLC, the Lenders
and Group Agents from time to time
party thereto, and Deutsche Bank AG,
New York Branch, as Administrative
Agent.  10-Q  001-34756  10.2  November 2, 2018
  
             
56
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.64†
 Amendment No. 4 to Loan and
Security Agreement, dated as of
August 16, 2018, by and among LML
Warehouse SPV, LLC, the Lenders
and Group Agents from time to time
party thereto, and Deutsche Bank AG,
New York Branch, as Administrative
Agent.  10-Q  001-34756  10.4  November 2, 2018
  
             
  10.65†
 Payoff and Termination Letter,
executed on December 28, 2018, by
and among LML Warehouse SPV,
LLC, the Lenders and Group Agents
from time to time party thereto, and
Deutsche Bank AG, New York
Branch, as Administrative Agent,
relating to Loan and Security
Agreement.  10-K    001-34756   10.54    February 19, 2019  
   
             
  10.66†
 Loan and Security Agreement,
executed on December 28, 2018, by
and among LML 2018 Warehouse
SPV, LLC, Tesla Finance LLC, the
Lenders and Group Agents from time
to time party thereto, Deutsche Bank
Trust Company Americas, as Paying
Agent, and Deutsche Bank AG, New
York Branch, as Administrative
Agent.  10-K    001-34756   10.55    February 19, 2019  
   
             
  10.67††
 Letter of Consent, dated as of June
14, 2019, by and among LML 2018
Warehouse SPV, LLC, Deutsche
Bank AG, New York Branch, as
Administrative Agent, and the Group
Agents party thereto, in respect of the
Loan and Security Agreement, dated
as of August 17, 2017 and as
amended from time to time, by and
among LML Warehouse SPV, LLC,
Tesla Finance LLC, and the Lenders,
Group Agents and Administrative
Agent from time to time party thereto. 10-Q    001-34756   10.1    July 29, 2019  
   
             
57
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.68††
 Amendment No. 1 to Loan and
Security Agreement, dated as of
August 16, 2019, by and among LML
2018 Warehouse SPV, LLC, Deutsche
Bank Trust Company Americas, as
Paying Agent, and Deutsche Bank
AG, New York Branch, as
Administrative Agent, and the
Lenders and Group Agents from time
to time party thereto.  10-Q    001-34756   10.2    October 29, 2019  
   
             
  10.69
 Amendment No. 2 to Loan and
Security Agreement, dated as of
December 13, 2019, by and among
LML 2018 Warehouse SPV, LLC,
Deutsche Bank Trust Company
Americas, as Paying Agent, and
Deutsche Bank AG, New York
Branch, as Administrative Agent, and
the Lenders and Group Agents from
time to time party thereto.  10-K  001-34756  10.69  February 13, 2020
  
             
  10.70  Purchase Agreement, dated as of
August 11, 2017, by and among the
Registrant, SolarCity and Goldman
Sachs & Co. LLC and Morgan
Stanley & Co. LLC as representatives
of the several initial purchasers
named therein. 8-K  001-34756  10.1  August 23, 2017
  
             
  10.71
 Amended and Restated Agreement
For Research & Development
Alliance on Triex Module
Technology, effective as of September
2, 2014, by and between The
Research Foundation For The State
University of New York, on behalf of
the College of Nanoscale Science and
Engineering of the State University of
New York, and Silevo, Inc. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16  November 6, 2014
  
             
58
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.72
 First Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
October 31, 2014, by and between
The Research Foundation For The
State University of New York, on
behalf of the College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of the State
University of New York, and Silevo,
Inc. 10-K(1)  001-35758  10.16a  February 24, 2015
  
             
  10.73
 Second Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
December 15, 2014, by and between
The Research Foundation For The
State University of New York, on
behalf of the College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of the State
University of New York, and Silevo,
Inc. 10-K(1)  001-35758  10.16b  February 24, 2015
  
             
  10.74
 Third Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
February 12, 2015, by and between
The Research Foundation For The
State University of New York, on
behalf of the College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of the State
University of New York, and Silevo,
Inc. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16c  May 6, 2015
  
             
59
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.75
 Fourth Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
March 30, 2015, by and between The
Research Foundation For The State
University of New York, on behalf of
the College of Nanoscale Science and
Engineering of the State University of
New York, and Silevo, Inc. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16d  May 6, 2015
  
             
  10.76
 Fifth Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
June 30, 2015, by and between The
Research Foundation For The State
University of New York, on behalf of
the College of Nanoscale Science and
Engineering of the State University of
New York, and Silevo, LLC. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16e  July 30, 2015
  
             
  10.77
 Sixth Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
September 1, 2015, by and between
The Research Foundation For The
State University of New York, on
behalf of the College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of the State
University of New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16f  October 30, 2015
  
             
60
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.78
 Seventh Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
October 9, 2015, by and between The
Research Foundation For The State
University of New York, on behalf of
the College of Nanoscale Science and
Engineering of the State University of
New York, and Silevo, LLC. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16g  October 30, 2015
  
             
  10.79
 Eighth Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
October 26, 2015, by and between
The Research Foundation For The
State University of New York, on
behalf of the College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of the State
University of New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-Q(1)  001-35758  10.16h  October 30, 2015
  
             
  10.80
 Ninth Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
December 9, 2015, by and between
The Research Foundation For The
State University of New York, on
behalf of the College of Nanoscale
Science and Engineering of the State
University of New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-K(1)  001-35758  10.16i  February 10, 2016
  
             
61
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.81
 Tenth Amendment to Amended and
Restated Agreement For Research &
Development Alliance on Triex
Module Technology, effective as of
March 31, 2017, by and between The
Research Foundation For The State
University of New York, on behalf of
the Colleges of Nanoscale Science
and Engineering of the State
University of New York, and Silevo,
LLC. 10-Q   001-34756   10.8   May 10, 2017
  
             
  10.82††
 Grant Contract for State-Owned
Construction Land Use Right, dated
as of October 17, 2018, by and
between Shanghai Planning and Land
Resource Administration Bureau, as
grantor, and Tesla (Shanghai) Co.,
Ltd., as grantee (English translation). 10-Q   001-34756   10.2   July 29, 2019
  
             
  10.83††
 Facility Agreement, dated as of
September 26, 2019, by and between
China Merchants Bank Co., Ltd.
Beijing Branch and Tesla Automobile
(Beijing) Co., Ltd. (English
translation). 10-Q   001-34756   10.3   October 29, 2019
  
             
  10.84††
 Statement Letter to China Merchants
Bank Co., Ltd. Beijing Branch from
Tesla Automobile (Beijing) Co., Ltd.,
dated as of September 26, 2019
(English translation). 10-Q   001-34756   10.4   October 29, 2019
  
             
  10.85††
 Fixed Asset Syndication Loan
Agreement, dated as of December 18,
2019, by and among Tesla (Shanghai)
Co., Ltd., China Construction Bank
Corporation, China (Shanghai) Pilot
Free Trade Zone Special Area Branch,
Agricultural Bank of China Shanghai
Changning Sub-branch, Shanghai
Pudong Development Bank Co., Ltd.,
Shanghai Branch, and Industrial and
Commercial Bank of China Limited,
China (Shanghai) Pilot Free Trade
Zone Special Area Branch (English
translation). 10-K  001-34756  10.85  February 13, 2020
  
             
62
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  10.86††
 Fixed Asset Syndication Loan
Agreement and Supplemental
Agreement, dated as of December 18,
2019, by and among Tesla (Shanghai)
Co., Ltd., China Construction Bank
Corporation, China (Shanghai) Pilot
Free Trade Zone Special Area Branch,
Agricultural Bank of China Shanghai
Changning Sub-branch, Shanghai
Pudong Development Bank Co., Ltd.,
Shanghai Branch, and Industrial and
Commercial Bank of China Limited,
China (Shanghai) Pilot Free Trade
Zone Special Area Branch (English
translation). 10-K  001-34756  10.86  February 13, 2020
  
             
  10.87††
 Syndication Revolving Loan
Agreement, dated as of December 18,
2019, by and among Tesla (Shanghai)
Co., Ltd. China Construction Bank
Corporation, China (Shanghai) Pilot
Free Trade Zone Special Area Branch,
Agricultural Bank of China Shanghai
Changning Sub-branch, Shanghai
Pudong Development Bank Co., Ltd.,
Shanghai Branch, and Industrial and
Commercial Bank of China Limited,
China (Shanghai) Pilot Free Trade
Zone Special Area Branch (English
translation). 10-K  001-34756  10.87  February 13, 2020
  
             
  21.1  List of Subsidiaries of the Registrant 10-K  001-34756  21.1  February 13, 2020   
             
  23.1
  Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers
LLP, Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm   10-K  001-34756  23.1  February 13, 2020
  
             
  31.1
  Rule 13a-14(a) / 15(d)-14(a)
Certification of Principal Executive
Officer   10-K  001-34756  31.1  February 13, 2020
  
             
  31.2
  Rule 13a-14(a) / 15(d)-14(a)
Certification of Principal Financial
Officer   10-K  001-34756  31.2  February 13, 2020
  
             
  31.3
  Rule 13a-14(a) / 15(d)-14(a)
Certification of Principal Executive
Officer   —    —    —    —  
  X
             
  31.4
  Rule 13a-14(a) / 15(d)-14(a)
Certification of Principal Financial
Officer   —    —    —    —  
  X
             
63
 
Exhibit   Incorporated by Reference  Filed
Number Exhibit Description  Form  File No.  Exhibit Filing Date  Herewith
  32.1*   Section 1350 Certifications   10-K  001-34756  32.1  February 13, 2020   
 
  
          
101.INS*  Inline XBRL Instance Document   10-K  001-34756  101.INS February 13, 2020   
 
  
          
101.SCH*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension
Schema Document   10-K  001-34756  101.SCH February 13, 2020
  
 
  
          
101.CAL*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension
Calculation Linkbase Document.   10-K  001-34756  101.CAL February 13, 2020
  
 
  
          
101.DEF*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension
Definition Linkbase Document   10-K  001-34756  101.DEF February 13, 2020
  
 
  
          
101.LAB*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension
Label Linkbase Document   10-K  001-34756  101.LAB February 13, 2020
  
 
  
          
101.PRE*
  Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension
Presentation Linkbase Document   10-K  001-34756  101.PRE February 13, 2020
  
             
104
  Cover Page Interactive Data File
(formatted as inline XBRL with
applicable taxonomy extension
information contained in Exhibits
101)             
   
 
* Previously filed or furnished, as applicable, with Original Form 10-K
** Indicates a management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement
† Confidential treatment has been requested for portions of this exhibit
†† Portions of this exhibit have been redacted in compliance with Regulation S-K Item 601(b)(10).
(1) Indicates a filing of SolarCity
64
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
  Tesla, Inc.
   
Date: April 28, 2020  /s/ Zachary J. Kirkhorn
  Zachary J. Kirkhorn
  Chief Financial Officer
  (Principal Financial Officer and
Duly Authorized Officer)
 
 
65
